I wouldn't waste time on this trivial person except for one thing. If the Peggy Noonans of the world are jumping off Obama's ship this early, there's something going on and she smells it in the wind.
Last week as we were driving in the van, out of the blue, Aaron said, "When I grow up, I am going to find the cure for cancer."
Halloween night of course, I decorate the house and often will show movies on a screen outside my house. 16mm movies projected, not this newfangled DVD projector stuff. (Though, I admit I'd have more range if I did use DVDs.)
* Watch cartoons
“Reducing numbers through redundancy is essential if we are to have smaller Armed Forces that deliver the best possible operational capability.
Jose A. Guadalupe, 37, New York, N.Y.
After this day of working like the farmers do we can all say we can’t wait to share this knowledge with everyone who will listen. Look out world, Africa is growing life-changing crops!
“. . . God, if thou wilt save Israel by mine hand as thou hast said, behold, I will put a fleece of wool on the floor; and if the dew be on the fleece only, and it be dry upon all the earth, than shall I know that thou wilt save Israel by mine hand as thou hast said.”
But here's why I think it's stupid for Black Americans to ridicule African immigrants, especially at an institution of higher learning. Don't they know that the African men and women whom they mock are the ones who will be held up as future exemplars of Black achievement? African immigrants are among the most educated groups in the U.S. The rate of college graduation among African immigrants is four times the rate of native-born Black Americans. Given that rates of college graduation among Blacks are remarkably low, if you remove African immigrants and their children from that "bucket", what's left is pretty pathetic. These same African immigrants are the Blacks that scholars and historians will use as evidence to show that we are capable of ascending corporate, academic and professional ladders of success. African immigrants and their children are among the people whose achievements will be trumpeted so native-born Black Americans can feel good about what Blacks can do.
In a recently epublished high-profile paper (Roberts et al., in press), SRS scores were reported for 25 autistic children who were recruited then divided into two groups according to performance on a popular test of language abilities.
A strange sensation is running down his back.
Of course I meant it this way! How dare you suggest otherwise. Ok the rain wasn't meant to be there - or the scratches but I love those now. All wabi sabi and what have you.
If you opt against a religious ceremony, you have more freedom with who you choose to officiate. The best way to save money is to have a friend perform the ceremony. One of my friends asked her uncle to officiate her wedding. There’s a few ways to get certified. There are some denominations, such as the Universal Life Church and First Nation Ministry, that open ordination to anyone and allow you to get certified online. If you choose to go this route, make sure you check the legal requirements of your state.
* You continue to amaze us with your words and the small sentences that you are stringing together. You are like this whole little person!
This week at Tiddly Inks we have a few new team members - YAY!!! These new ladies are absolutely fabulous too! We also have a new challenge - Mother's Day. I created an adorable card for my mama with this super cute Tiddly Inks image called - Send Me A Sign Bugg. I used Photoshop to include the sentiment. Wouldn't she be cute for any even though - you could spell out Happy Birthday, for you Dad, Congrats, Thank you - I love her!!!
In all, I give these fellow, movie goers 45 thumbs up. For that is the amount of thumbs tortured during these movie going experiences. Yet, in a world where everyone is watching their movies at home or on their phones, I’m sheepishly grateful for Old Lady, Drag Queen, and Maybe-Nurse because they make me feel alive. They make me feel not so alone like I’m having a communal experience and at the same time, slightly angry. That’s how human beings love one another with anger and annoyance. So, the next time someone destroys your movie, thank them. I do.
“Poor boy. I know. But where can we take him?”
Abortion also runs contrary to the Hippocratic Oath and every existing historic code of medical ethics. It is therefore not surprising that so many doctors, of all faiths and none, do not want to be involved in a procedure which they believe should not be part of medical care.
Looking at them side by side on the same venue and approximately same time of year they are eerily similar. Some will say that Bolt had more wind, and he did. But frankly you run what you run and the only thing that matters at the end of the day is what your time was and how you do when you race each other. I’m not a fan of recalculating times (far more variables than simply wind reading and altitude) so as I look at the numbers as they are they are nearly identical through 150 meters give or take a few hundredths, which says that Gay CAN compete with Bolt over the 200 meter distance. And dare I say, once again, that while Bolt has been on an incredible run these past two years, he has not had to deal with Gay over this distance since Sept of 2007.
I've been studying a lot of armor lately, and I think the idea of what your wearing also being able to save your skin has seeped into my styling goals. Although these vintage Doc Martens probably won't protect me from any real danger, they do shield my shins from the garbage and hobo piss ridden landscape I traverse everyday. I suppose if I ever find myself hurled into a high-speed body-to-pavement skidding situation, these boots might save some of my skin?
Oh, right. I didn't mention I'm still having the visitors. I have caught many more EVPs. There is a little child here and a male.
To me, you are still nothing more than a little boy who is just like a hundred thousand other little boys. And I have no need of you. And you, on your part, have no need of me. To you, I am nothing more than a fox like a hundred thousand other foxes. But if you tame me, then we shall need each other. To me, you will be unique in all the world. To you, I shall be unique in all the world…
True there were excesses. Those with money were not afraid to show it. In 2006 Ireland, apparently, had the highest per capita private ownership of helicopters in the world (who makes these calculations?); “EVERYONE owns a helicopter”, one multi – millionaire businessman remarked to me. Even among those who didn’t, purchases of Mercedes, Beamers and high-end SUVs were sufficiently common to make it appear the roads were choked with them. But the prosperity had trickled down , and spread out. Altogether, in the three years 2005-2007, 671,000 fresh automobiles were registered, one for every five people in the country aged fifteen and up . The purchase of holiday homes and investment properties in Ireland and in locations like Bulgaria, Turkey and elsewhere became commonplace, not just for the wealthy but for many others, cashing in on the equity in their houses.
The article refers to how White students punished the other ethnic groups by not giving more funds to them:
Back at the prison, Kozrak is holding a newspaper in front of Jonah's face (see, he ain't dead kids. It was just a literary device!),gloating that since Hex is 'dead', the prison can do whatever it wants to Hex. With everything left in him, Jonah lashes out at Kozrak,punching him in the face, kneeing him in the jaw and finally slamming his head into the stone wall. Grabbing Kozrak's whip, Jonah staggers out of the cell to the storeroom, where he finds his belongings.
“Theresa Villiers has closed the door to Heathrow again, which…..
When it’s your turn to speak, is the name of Jesus mentioned?
I've written about Elisabeth Sanxay Holding's special brand of suspense and crime that features menace in the suburbs before. I've talked about how Charlotte Armstrong and Margaret Millar built upon her legacy. Now I have discovered one more talented and unsung woman mystery writer who belongs in their company -- Mildred Davis. Davis sure knows how to put the mystery back in the mystery novel. The opening chapters of The Room Upstairs (1948) are filled with so many questions you can't help but keep turning the pages. Anthony Boucher wrote in his San Francisco Chronicle review: " If there had never been a 'novel of suspense' before, the phrase would have had to be coined to describe this story." A better capsule blurb was never truer.
Top of the list on my visits was to be Halfords at the bikes so I could choose my new bike ready for work next week, we did go in and I put £5 deposit on a silver shockwave bike! I didn’t dare go over £100 although I would have preferred a darker looking bike although I do find the one I chose very comfy!
I turned 16 and my sister and her boyfriend couldn't lock me up in my room anymore, I had the right to choose where I wanted to be, and I chose Don.
2) Why Don't You...have an elk-hide trunk for the back of your car? Hermès of Paris will make this.
Didn’t Trayvon Martin Have a Right to Stand His Ground, Too?
½ tsp. instant yeast
And I’ve gotten even more sick, fun:( Well, thankfully I’m broke, because I won’t have a choice to stay at home and get better, and I can’t feel like I’m being lazy and not going out and looking for opportunities… I legitimately can’t leave my house tomorrow.
peace!
How did our ancestors get beyond their baser instincts … beyond survival to … living … to giving and to caring about those beyond their immediate circle of family and friends?
March weather can be almost anything here (this year we had many days in the 80s and one day of snow). Their trip was in the days before air conditioning. And yet, check out how Dad dressed to drive – suit, tie, and hat! Mom was 6 or 7 months pregnant with her first child, but of course, dressed nicely for the trip. And all of this with their cocker spaniel.
I would say I instantly fell in love but I was already in love. She had seen my show and I love anyone who has seen my show, whether they liked me or not. Man or woman.
So getting a legacy deal isn't about getting into print anymore. Which means you'd be signing with a Big 6 publisher in order for them to release your ebook.
As the recession hit, the Legislature started passing budgets it knew were unbalanced, causing the state to run out of cash mid-year and run up billions of dollars in unpaid bills. Periodically, the state would issue general-obligation bonds to pay off the bills backlog, again shifting pension liabilities into bond debt.
"You have Joseph Smith's inspired translation?"
While I was in Colorado recently, my nephew raved about a new brewery opening up in Loveland, Colorado. I’ve not sampled any of their offerings but I’ve visited their website
At Cannes, for example, top honors in the Cyber category went to Wieden...and DDB Sweden....The Cyber Agency of the Year Award went to Crispin Porter + Bogusky."This must be galling to digital agencies. For years we ad people had to put up with their smug declarations that we "just don't get it."
Robert M. Pirsig, Zen and the Art of Motorcycle Maintenance
The first drafting clinic of this season start tomorrow, Oct. 17th, 9:00 am. Class size is limited so please contact me if you plan to show up. I will email the location when you respond. jennie@romanreign.com
The movie, which takes place on fictional Amity Island, NY…was filmed on the island of Martha’s Vineyard, Massachusetts.
I never met Mr. Corwin, but a few years ago I was present during a live telephone interview session back in 2007 at a local bookstore. Chicago radio personality Steve Darnell was doing a special talk on the history of old time radio and was promoting Those Were the Days. He was able to get Mr. Corwin on the speaker phone (he was at his home in California) for a few minutes, and it was cool to hear him talk about his career.
Congratulations Crafty Girl! Please email mom at krisb33 AT yahoo DOT com for more details on your winnings. We have a cute winner’s badge for you on our badges page, if you want to grab it!
I have a new job as education manager at Melbourne aquarium.. I start on the 11th... I had to resign from my teaching job, and that was hard, because it was all abrupt however I've been wanting a change for a while..so I finally had the confidence to apply and two interviews and a presentation later, I got it.
Todays offerings are the doors in room two.
So I was a mess when I arrived at the party. I relaxed when for the first hour my friend (blogger Phylotopia–she was there to examine the science of the event) and I were the only ladies there. It was a sausage fest. Although hosted by a movie theater, the party was held in a yard behind the theater. There was booze, thank goodness. The bags were out on tables and after you got your drink, you got to sniffing. Cups of coffee beans were provided, so you could cleanse your palette. It took me a while to find a smell I liked. Most of the shirts smelled musty and dank and reminded me of all my worst boyfriends’ houses–the unwashed sheets and beer cans. One shirt just smelled like marijuana.
OK, let's just get to the Rose Giveaway. After lots of dramatic pausing, Lindzi gets one and duh of course Courtney. Poor Nicki and her Greek tunic that make her look like a member of the chorus in "Antigone." Into the Crying Limo with you.
As a pastor, I picked up the book as part of my research for an upcoming project. It has stimulated my thinking and inspired me to action in a couple of key areas of my work. I recommend the book to professional minister and lay person alike. It sounds a clarion call to action without taking an alarmist tone.
But think about it.
“Anal beads… TICKLE MY PROSTATE!”
I am pecking away at my book and more determined than ever to finish it before the end of this challenge.
Routes: If you're trying to get to Fells Point from downtown, you should seek out the #10 bus line, which drops you off at the Broadway Market at Broadway and Eastern, three short blocks from Max's and less than that for Alexander's, etc. The #11 route also stops in Fells Point at Broadway and Aliceanna. Bus routes 7, 11, and 13 will get you to various points around Canton, with varying success depending on your origin and exact destination. Routes 1 and 64 will get you to Federal Hill, with the former also getting you to Locust Point. Several routes will get you between downtown and Mount Vernon/Station North/Penn Station, including the 3, 11, and 64; simply remember that Charles Street is one-way northbound and the streets to either side east and west (St. Paul and Maryland/Cathedral/Light) are one-way southbound. Light Rail can get you from downtown or Glen Burnie to the Timonium Fairgrounds on Saturday the 8th for the Oktoberfest; it will get you from the north and south to Pratt Street Ale House for the Real Ale Fest on the 15th.
Company Description: “An ultra long-lasting, matte finish, oil-free, waterproof, full coverage concealer. Full Cover is perfect for concealing the most extreme flaws, such as scars, severe skin damage, beauty spots, depigmentation or birthmarks. It can even hide tattoos. Waterproof and long-lasting, it holds even under extreme conditions thanks to its perfectly stable formula. It evens out the skin tone and camouflages imperfections for extended periods of time.”
He shall not feed on either earth or pelf,
- Truffle with Shitake Mushroom - Paired w/ Dragon’s Milk
I offered to lend a welcoming hand. As Christy lives a distance from me
Now Jesus is the way, life and truth. His life and death perfected worship which the Old covenant only tried to achieve by way of proxy through animals: “For the law having a shadow of good things to come, and not the very image of the things, can never with those sacrifices which they offered year by year continually make the comers thereunto perfect. (Heb 10:1)”
The film spans America following rural and urban families, some unemployed some with parents working more than one job, and no one making enough to survive on.
I just finished reading about William Lloyd Garrison, editor of the abolitionist paper The Liberator which ran from 1831 to 1865. This guy was fascinating, and his passion inspiring. My reading also gave me a good feel for the all-around anti-slavery atmosphere, especially in the North, before the Civil War. It’s easy to understand just how hostile the South was to the idea of emancipation for the slaves, but I was a bit surprised at the resistance to it in the North, as well. (Thank you, oversimplified history textbooks.)
There was a post on one of the sites I follow about children's shows. Well, more correctly, it was a generalized post on television shows, asking for input from women about what they let their kids watch. Which turned almost instantly into a bash-fest.
So my new sign is slightly crooked and in my attempts to correct it, the "g" is missing, but that's okay because I am doing what I love with the people that I love, and that is enough :) And also because we're southern, "introducin'" is totally acceptable. Right? Right!
9. Niqabs (veils) from Saudi Arabia
This is a bit different from usual posts since I don't actually own the material but I feel it is just more important to properly archive this stuff. You can download the files from a Bandcamp page that Greg uploaded. He and Mario Quintero mastered this live set at Black Box Studios in San Diego, CA.
We have an election coming up here in Brenham. It is for the city of Brenham and the only ad I’ve seen for it has been in the classified section of our newspaper. Maybe it’s elsewhere but I’ve not seen it. I have seen very few things in the paper about any debate or Q&A session among the candidates so I’m wondering how the voters will make an informed decision? Do they go on name recognition alone? One name I recognize would be one I wouldn’t vote for. I don’t live in the city limits so I won’t be able to vote in this election but members of our group do. I think they should be allowed the opportunity to question those running. Are they running to fulfill an agenda or to help the community? Why do they think their way is “the” way?
But ‘comic-book movies’ are perhaps the most visible apsect of the superhero phenomenon, and its impact on global media culture. Images of superhero characters have been emblazoned across a dizzying array of licensed merchandise for decades, while popular culture abounds with references to superheroes and their characteristic traits, a sure sign that they have entered the lexicon of everyday life.
With that thought in mind, about reaching people for Jesus, if you’re interested in being a part of our launch team, contact me. The launch team is the group of people that get the church off the ground. Love to connect if you’re interested in learning more. So far, we have a great team coming together.
The talent on this forum, never ceases to amaze and inspire me. Below are the entries.
We often talk of "putting off the natural man". The natural man has base tendencies, is selfish and thinks of himself. It's innate in us, and part of our purpose in coming to earth is to learn how to become more Christ like and put off, or deny the lesser tendencies in ourselves and learn to have charity. I believe this extends to our children as well. If not them, then who?
TPM
Written by: James Blake / James Litherland
I could not find the home for this one...but is surely conjures up many possibilities for a story.
Danvers State Insane Asylum.
Brewer's Alley - Scotch Ale
Much can be taken to any other Italian city. Prime sights to enjoy art galleries and museums, learn about Italy's many historic landmarks, and view the in italy pashmina of the in italy pashmina, the Alps form the in italy pashmina of Italy presents Sardinia, the in italy pashmina in Mediterranean Sea. The obvious fantasies, which would surround an island, accomplish their job beautifully to wrap Sardinia in an attractive destination because of a certain period of time, during which you would like to use.
Dr. Glassman is Professor of Dental Practice and Director of Community Oral Health and Director of the Pacific Center for Special Care at the University of the Pacific Arthur A. Dugoni School of Dentistry in San Francisco. Dr. Glassman also directs a residency program, widely recognized for its emphasis on preparing residents to care for people with complex medical, physical, and psychological conditions within a general dentistry practice.
Pure Innocence Magician stamp set
14And Jattir with its grass-lands, and Eshtemoa with its grass-lands;
But ah, the wonders of Netflix. I would like to say thanks to my friends Ruth and Russell for introducing us to Netflix. I'm usually the last person to hop on any kind of media/technology bandwagon, and this was much the same. I ignored Netflix the same way I ignored Facebook and fancy new cell phones... until it was forced on me. With cell phones, people wouldn't call they would text, and I finally upgraded to a phone with a keyboard so as not to spend ten minutes typing out two sentences. With facebook, people posted our wedding pictures on it and wouldn't send them to us any other way so I finally joined. With Netflix, we were sent a one month free subscription, so I tried it. And with each one of those things, I was hooked. And I watched all of Glee on Netflix. I am a total Gleek. I think I love it so much because I LOVE show choir.
November Rain – Guns & Roses
10. Favorite comfort food?
Give them their freedom for which you control
ODIs- 233, Runs- 7381, Avg- 41.70, 100s- 8, High- 119*
Jeremy sat awestruck. The oldest trick in the book. But he didn’t know whether to pat himself or kick his own rear. Pretty dumb, to say the solution and not know you did.
I used to be a hopeless romantic, then something happened made me change my perspective of women, I think forever, now I can’t trust them. It is quite sad but that’s the truth.
For a more unusual take on a Christmas tree, I like this mini wire-scupture, featuring a wire-wrapped star, crystals, and polymer clay roses, by WireArtInk. The texture of the wire just really lends itself to the springiness of fir trees:
Love the colour - Green, Navy and Grey. Most of all I like them against the white background. When I saw this, I immediately thought of Woodgrain Silhouettes Additions from Wplus9 and Turning a New Leaf from PTI.
Nov 22 Oxford Academy Oxford, UK
so she could visit the kids and help us get some projects completed with the porch/front of the house being our main focus. We got a late start on the porch project since we spent the first weekend trying to get our fence off the ground (bad pun?) and then my Mom and I got deathly ill. Okay so that is a bit of an exaggeration but we were both very sick one full day because of dinner from the night before. I will not be eating any taco salads for a while, especially if it has a chunky salsa on it. Thankfully the kids and Aaron didn’t eat the salsa and I was able to take the kids to school for the day since neither of us were in the position to take care of them in a
It’s an Epidemic (10) – Complete MEET YOUR MAKER
Many p?ople refer to the Oute? Banks as ? f?shermen’s p?radise ?nd if ?ou ?re new t? the spo?t, pier fishing i? ? great place t? start! Ther? is ? b?g fish out ther? with yo?r name ?n it j?st waiting f?r you to cast o?t y?ur line. Where d? you hook ? “big one” ?f you do not have ? boat? Y?u guessed ?t! Right on the pier! Some of the largest f?sh on reco?d ?ere caught on the pier!
a large and popular chain of beauty stores – as retail supervisors. They’d always looked out for each other, always been there for one another through good times and bad; more like sister’s than best friends, neither one of them could really think of their life without the other one now. They were good for each other – Aimee kept Jemma’s feet on the ground during those times when she had a tendency to get carried away, and Jemma brought out the more confident side of a much quieter Aimee. They balanced each other out, which could only be a good thing when they were due to spend the next two weeks together sailing the Mediterranean
newest addiction.. I am going to add some of my instagram photo's.. I just love the size of these..All I am doing is printing them in wallet sizes so I get that square look and stitching a some plastic sheets to fit them in with out moving around..
‘I love you.’ It was a lie.
First, they tell you, you’ll dismiss Twitter as far too overwhelming. You’ll abandon, possibly for months and return only reluctantly because people you respect keep telling you it’s not what you think.
Which was the most difficult scene for you to write?
Images: Saturated Canary; Ribbons and Rosettes; Plantin School Book
Roots and Wings Co shared a really cute Lego party. Love these lego crayons, but she also made Lego decorations, snacks, and even soap! So fun!
The police are out of touch with reality for expressing shock at the murder of a tourist in Gugulethu in Cape Town, the SA Institute of Race Relations said on Tuesday.
Isn`t that what you anti-Whites are doing to White people by flooding our communities with non-Whites and telling us we have to “assimilate” and “celebrate diversity”?
As intriguing as that sounds, that’s not really the plot at all. The part that’s true: her origins and her future. The part that takes the reader into a world that is not the book: Evalle is not under suspicion, but she’s worried because of what she is, the manner in which the killing was done, looks more like what her kind do their victims. Her ‘former’ allies are still her allies.
rock or water
Students in J457, Advanced Editing, are writing guest posts for this blog this semester. This is the sixth of these posts. John Dougherty of Goldsboro, N.C., is a senior in the news-ed sequence with a second major in environmental studies. He was on the Daily Tar Heel’s sports desk as a copy editor and writer once
gimme the he-man's solid bliss
We will be married six years in June, and in that six years, we have had one legit vacation and one weekend get-away. The single get-away was last year to the little town of Kingswood where we attended my friend's wedding and stayed in the house of my friend's parents.
One of the many health benefits of drinking aloe vera juice includes the fact that it helps in improving the circulation in the body. This it does by improving the quality of blood and getting rid of the buildup of dead cells as well as maintaining the blood consistency. Other than these functions, it also helps in decreasing high blood pressure in the body and prevents heart attacks.
After the game we discussed how it ran. Some options to help further balance the various factions:
There were four large dimsum steamers, three of which were empty. The fourth one had about 5 pieces of shriveled up pork siomai on one side. Do I have to mention that the steamers weren’t steamy? I had no problems holding them with bare hands… they weren’t even warm.
He will never fail us
There's nothing more moody than NY weather. These past few weeks, I've suffered the brunt of unexpected rainshowers and surprisingly warm weather. rain, rain go away.
I came up with the Larousse Gastronomique (traditional print media) and MasterChef (food bloggers) analogy in a conversation I had with a journalist who could not understand the appeal of food blogs, did not trust them and had no idea about twitter either. The analogy went down well with both parties.
The huge baskets from Target ($40) are a really an important part of the design.
I am so inspired that I plan to reread the two follow-up encyclicals that complete the trilogy of love, hope and charity.
I can’t tell you how many times I have had to provide the same information (over and over) to my WASband’s attorney… ugh, I swear! (Literally)
People with food their diets are wrong
"He who conquers others is strong; he who conquers himself is mighty."
BSS: "Even though I look like a blue-skinned-zombie, and I literally have *no teeth*."
Fruit distributors often keep an eye on ethylene levels by installing monitors, but these systems are generally too pricey for supermarkets to install.
I know its been quite a while since I've written something, much less posted any of my recipes! Well I can assure you that I will be putting up some recipes soon. I'm finally settling in and getting back to my "normal" life without John and back at school.
There, I said it - now it's out there. Scream and yell and send me hate mail if you must (please don't), but deep down you know it's true.
They are awesome.
Please leave a comment. I'd love to know who's reading these monthly GFA posts. Are you familiar with this ministry? Do you currently sponsor a Bridge of Hope Child or is it something you are willing to prayerfully consider? Take a moment to pray for GFA and all the work they do, but especially pray for these children (these starving children) who are dying in India waiting for sponsors today.
UPDATE: APRIL 26, 2012
Sometimes I think the main purpose of farming is an excuse to wear Carhartt’s and be manly.
Would you be kind enough to ask him if this is the case? And ask him
The decision, which suggests in the ruling that wholesalers are an imperative component to alcoholic beverage regulation, is a benefit to craft and specialty brands, who rely on a diverse and abundant wholesale network to get brands to retail.
Haiyore! Nyaruko-San ep. 3
You can’t do it on your own, your nature is cursed
K: Luke
Steve Houghton (Lab) 1,684
and a Snickers bar. Today you can get everything
Available online. Priced £30.00
Though Mr. Karzai appeared elated at the ceremony, he has frequently expressed frustration with the American presence, bitterly criticizing the United States on issues like night raids conducted by Special Operations troops and civilian casualties.
**Except for the weird difficulty Mexican restaurants seem to have with the concept of separate checks.
Overall, I think the first episode was about $5, and I don’t regret it. The animation takes a minute to get used to, but the controls are fairly intuitive. The game is similar to the old point and click puzzle games like Myst and Eric the Unready (one of my favorites). There are various puzzles to solve, like how to kill all the walkers silently or how to get the key for the pharmacy, and a series of actions have to be performed in order. It’s fairly straightforward and the sense of achievement for figuring it out isn’t as high as it might be if it wasn’t so straightforward. “Oh, I see I can pick this up. I must be able to use it over here. Oh, here’s where I can use it. Look, this is inside. I bet I can use it over on that other thing I could highlight but wasn’t able to use.” Also, there are some surprises. There are two characters in the game that are in the comics and the show, and no, Rick isn’t one of them.
Now, I am not as much of a science fiction geek as this seems to indicate. But, being asked to write a story inspired by Lem's writing was one of those opportunities I just had to have a try at... I delved into some of his writing, and was drawn into one story in particular, The Seventh Sally or How Trurl's Own Perfection Led to No Good. It triggered off a whole sequence of thoughts and ideas, and I sat down and wrote this story on a very rainy Manchester weekend. I've since learnt that The Seventh Sally was part of the inspiration for computer game The Sims!
The guide to password security (and why you should care) – Find out how your password security can be compromised, and how to create and manage secure passwords. From password creation to password management, follow this guide to ensure your data is safe, secure, and prepared to withstand a security breach.
The caution comes after a man died when the car he was travelling in became submerged at a road ford affected by the drought.
A single typical scam is when the payday lender provides really low interest without having a credit check needed. All you could do is fill out an internet app which suggests with regards to your details. The financial institution will usually decline the application. Most of them have zero physical address or imitation other details on their site so it’s not necessary to of keeping track of them.
Beaty stated that it was his qualified opinion that Andrew Putnam will more than likely defeat his opponent for the Falmouth county assembly seat by a landslide in the November election. Beaty finally said, “Good luck with your campaign for the county assembly of delegates, Mr. Putnam, and God speed!”
Also, let’s see if Solomon built up gold in violation of God’s prophesy:
On His Own will run in the colours of Semore Kurdi after the north-east businessman purchased a one-day lease of the horse in a charity auction in May, 2011. Graham Wylie, who owns On His Own, had originally intended to lease Prince De Beauchene, also trained by Willie Mullins. But an injury to his leading hope stopped that intention. Wylie offered the prize to raise money for the Children’s Heart Unit Fund at Newcastle’s Freeman Hospital, where his daughter Kiera underwent three major and successful operations since her birth in December,
The device was spotted and the bomb squad was called.
“You’ve signed up for a lot of volunteer work!” …True…
We correct and sigh.
Now, I won’t pretend that I didn’t secretly hope a bird couple would choose it so I could have an Up Close and Personal View of all things bird, but now that it’s happening this hope like a thing with feathers has taken flight. Bad Idea.
But I'm English if the English rule the roost.
Like a roller coaster that goes from 0 to 90 in a split second,
Also for the weekend.
International Role
The red and blue lights danced across the street, leaped from house to house, and trickled around most of Greenbury Drive. Hank and Chris were joined by a few more and a few more people as they could see two police cars and a circle of residents. Silhouettes walked towards the scene, stopped, turned, then walked away faster than they had approached.
The League extended the invitation to the Tribes in hopes of clearing up questions about tribal sovereignty and future interests as well as foster dialogue between the tribes and the state.
The Bride to Be will be 'The Bride' on Saturday ...
Let's take the Wayback Machine and look at the original true stellar knitters. Elizabeth Zimmermann, no argument there. Barbara Walker, Barbara Abbey, Maggie Righetti, Ida Riley Duncan, Gladys Thompson, Mary Thomas, Mary Walker Phillips, James Norbury, Marianne Kinzel--these are the people from whom I learned, and whose books are well loved and well used.
"Looking Back"
weight loss despite a good appetite
According to partial data compiled by South Asia Terrorism Portal (SATP), at least 664 persons were abducted between January 1, 2010, and April 8, 2012. 2010 recorded 242 abductions, 2011 and 2012 witnessed 328 and 94 respectively. During this period, Federally Administered Tribal Areas (FATA) witnessed the highest number of abductions (251) followed by Balochistan (183), Khyber Pakhtunkhwa (179), Sindh (43) and Punjab (8). These figures are likely to be a sever under-estimate, as lesser incidents of abduction, involving low profile individuals and small numbers, have become quotidian occurrences, and often go unreported.
“Well yeah,” I say. All of a sudden I feel like I’ve walked slam into a MOMENT…like the ones that used to come in frequent and ferocious waves when the kids were babies. When ‘firsts’ crashed on top of each other at such a pace that it was hard to keep the shutter snapping fast enough to capture them all.
Now, come on! Pull it together! Happy 100 years, Fenway Park. And happy Friday the 13th to everyone else.
9. Are you hoping for a girl this time? Kind of an unfair question. I wouldn't say I am "hoping" for a girl. I think it would be really cool to have a girl for a few reasons. A.) I am such a girly girl myself and I have always imagined having a sweet daughter someday to spoil and do girly girl things with as a mom. B.) It'd be fun to have one of each. C.) I really like pink. And purple. And tutus. I would ABSOLUTELY NOT be disappointed if we had another boy! Luke is so absolutely precious. I think it'd be so fun for him to have a little brother and for our family to be "me and the boys". :) It's truly a win win!
75) Your name must be Mickey because your so fine.
Note the special PHP tags which I am using to show if the checkbox has been selected by the Volunteer. When the form is first presented to the potential Volunteer none of the checkboxes are selected. However when the Volunteer fills out and submits the form s/he may have selected any number of options. And if the submit fails we want to be able to maintain the Volunteer’s selections on the form so that s/he may see and correct any mistakes made. This little snippet of code does that.
I thought about writing today so I walked to a café and bought a bottomless mug of coffee and put some milk in it and one third of a pack of splenda and stirred it around. I drank one cup then refilled my mug and started to drink another that was prepared the same way as before.
That's all for tonight, and that might be all until the general election.
Today just needs to end. I hate feeling like I want to punch someone. I’m not a very violent person unless I need to be. Basically people need to stay put of my way and not piss me off. My music today consist of, Right Now by Korn, and Raise Hell by (hed) P.E.
Is the fame of a dead man's deeds."
And onto the 3-D. Due to my kiln limitation I haven't done with in years but my good friend, who happens to be an excellent art teacher and guest teacher extraordinaire, tackled this lesson with some young men and women this summer. Look at their amazing results.
I used the stamp set with this week's Inkredible color challenge. The colors are: Peach Parfait, Real Red and Garden Green.
We enjoyed the fireworks on the 4th of July from the west side of Manhattan looking over the Hudson River. Although we missed a bit of it because we didn't know which part of the Hudson to look over. It was good but not as impressive as we had expected.
Argus building expected to fetch $12 million
Rita Blau, 52, New York, N.Y.
* 4 whole-grain or white hamburger buns
Roy: you're just throwing that wallflower at me ;cause you don't like Myra.
As Phil Falcone agrees to step down from control of LightSquared and creditors like Carl Icahn step up, the big question is what the troubled telecommunication venture’s radio spectrum is really worth. The guesses range from $120 billion — one estimate of the value to consumers of a new swath of telecom spectrum open for business – to zero.
Seats: 8
Ethan spit a phrase back at me during our 2 weeks in Yunnan and Guanxi (provinces bordering Vietnam and Burma), a wake-up to how much we chase the quaintly scenic, the un-”spoiled.” In China, the building is happening so fast and all at once, I think it’s part of the knee-jerk anti-China senftiment prevalent now. I think the build-out scares Americans far more than our own (slower, older) devastation of nature.
If a salad you were to punch you in the face with freshness, it would undoubtedly be Fattoush.
First there are the nightmares.
The Executive Office of the President released a statement yesterday regarding the House passage of the FY2013 appropriations bill for the Departments of Commerce and Justice as well as for science and related agencies. They are accusing the House of Representatives of violating the "bipartisan agreement to put the Nation on a sustainable fiscal course in enacting the Budget Control Act of 2011 (BCA)." They go on to say that the President's senior advisors would be urging him to veto this bill.
I have only a vague recollection of this game from my younger days and I only ever heard about it and never actually saw it played. It is full on in the States and they hold tournaments and everything. I have been researching these games topics extensively of late and I have come to realise that the US is not just another country, it’s a whole other universe. Nowhere have I come across so many differences between Americans and normal people and it has prompted me to put together a post regarding the various amusing dissimilarities. Stay tuned. But don’t let on to the Yanks, OK? The ones who I know and who love their beer are good people.
Understanding Chinese parenting through the cultural notion of training.” Child Development 65.4 (1994): 1111-1119. Print.
George Hill took over from Campbell. Hill had been the head coach at the U.S. Coast Guard Academy, where in two years he had won 11 games, all 11 victories coming in his second season (the USCGA was 0-21 in his first year as coach there). He couldn’t provide any forward momentum at The Citadel, though, going 33-42 in three seasons, all losing campaigns. Hill would later become a sportswriter and an author.
they banned together – 35,200 total hits
There have been some more changes.
7) The only time so called “anti-racists”, ever acknowledge the existence of White people, is when they are calling us names.
CB folder - Swiss dot
Here Hibbert (1962, p. 11) reports Mussolini's youthful contempt for the armed forces. Such anti-militarism would surely resound well with most student antiwar demonstrators of today.
The San Diego-based lawmaker contends that he did not introduce his bill to make the president look bad, since the number would reflect poorly on all individuals in charge of government.
TBA vs. TBA
Or my mom's going to get mad at me.
I had to talk myself into working out…because I let that picture mess with my head…but I rejected that, and picked a Zumba DVD…and that’s when the second blow hit…
The Awfully Big Blog Adventure is a group blog which I contribute to, and this weekend it's running the world's first online literary festival - details here. No tickets, no travelling, just lots of great authors talking about their books and book related stuff, plus competitions and give-aways and all sorts...And you don't have to miss a thing because it's all there forever.
May we all have our hopes, our will to try
I played viola with them and guitar, and some small ‘dingly danglies’, and I did some singing also. It was great. múm gave me a fantastic opportunity. I just basically picked up a viola and went on tour. It’s great fun to play with them, this great energy of just ‘doing’. It was my first experience of touring and it definitely added to my music vocabulary somewhere in the subconscious. Nothing that I am doing now is strongly related to the múm experience or anything, but all these collaborative projects provide different ways of dealing with the aesthetics of music. What I particularly liked about múm was that even though it could seem like very simple music sometimes, they were always dealing with very refined aesthetics
CE rep isn’t too bad to get. Complete quests in Zangamarsh and Borean Tundra, and run lots of Steamvaults. You can get Coilfang Armament drops to speed it up.
Hallo nochmal an diesem Freitag, den 11.11.11 :)
One Day: I'll be honest, I bought this and read it because the movie is coming out in August. An engaging, yet at times heart-wrenching, book. It checks in with a couple (at times friends, at times more) on the same date every year. You see how much their lives change (or don't) year-over-year. It also makes you reflect on how you're living your life and if you're where you want to be. Four stars!
Frank O'Brien (Joined team in Johnny P's slot)
Congratulations to Belinda and we wish her well in her future endeavours.
Mostly, I'm just tired. The other night I woke up at 1:57 am. I feel back asleep around around 4:45 am. You can imagine what I pleasure I was to be around yesterday. I swear, I think I wore my angry-eyebrows all day. I was also making big deals about little things-- oh no, I have to go to the post office! I was emotionally defunct.
The next issue then is being able to cool the wort at the end of the boil. Of course I could leave it to cool overnight, with the inherent risks of infection (bacterial and/or wild yeast). And then there is the concern that without the crash cooling the cold break will not be secured.
Please contact us here at papercraftstar@yahoo.com with your choice(s) by number. Well done !!
So this time now – 2012, 2013, 2014 and beyond – this is your time. Your time to make your own decisions, pick your own country, do your own thing. Buy a flat in Berlin, study fashion in Paris, created hydro electricity in Iceland.
I discovered that there are lots of the Salmon postcards to be had so I have started collecting a few of the village and cottage ones. They are quite hard to find as many that are on ebay are views or of places like Oxford or Windsor. They are very nice but it's the rural ones that I really like.
If you would like to help out or contribute to the clean-up efforts at Old Philadelphia, please contact me via email at angelamsspi@gmail.com for more information.
“What is it, sweetie?”
It is fair, for example, to ask people entering the workforce and starting a career to bail out their elders, while facing a brutal job market and carrying enormous amounts of student debt? As I wrote in this short article two years ago, generational battles over taxation and public spending may become ugly and divisive.
13On the east three gates; on the north three gates; on the south three gates; and on the west three gates.
Sherry Brown
Spring has marched right into season, and if that's not reason enough for a Hoedown party, I don't know what is! Grab your best spring colors and come celebrate the season, and our weekly challenge, with us. If you are new to our challenge, click on the link in the left sidebar to see how this all works. Play along each week with a Hambo Stamps image (rubber or digital) and you are in the loop for some awesome FREE images! Don't have any Hambo images yet? Click HERE for Freebies and JOIN US!
The lunch has been excellent though. Right down the street from my office is a salad bar place called "Suppe y Salate" where one can find pumpkin and pear chunks, fresh walnuts, and diced rainbow paprika among other toppings for a salad. When I'm not in the mood for that, I go for a falafel wrap at this AMAZING place Gyros Sofra around the corner where they make their own fluffy bread right in front of you, then fill it with homemade falafel, red pepper paste, hummus and tahini sauce. It's so good that I actually went there 4 times in one week but I decided to give them a break in case they think I'm weird. (Although let's be real: I'm going today.)
BAKED PUMPKIN BREAD
With apologies to the Muslim Council of Britain for the hate crime no doubt implicit in our use of the term, Muslim terrorism has been a key public concern for so long now that we consider it to be a fairly well-worked seam. There is little we feel we can add to the discussion on terrorism, so we propose to largely ignore it in this document. We will reiterate, however, what we said above about how the indirect costs of terrorism (police budget, security services budget, airport security budgets, indirect costs through productivity losses, etc.) have not, to our knowledge, ever been calculated with any accuracy. This research should, in our opinion, be conducted so as to enable a better understanding of the costs of the presence of so many Muslims in our country.
‘For God did not send His Son into the world to condemn the world, but in order that the world might be saved through Him.’ (ESV)
Meanwhile, the Internet is rife with opinions, supporters and haters.
J. Dimps — short for dimples — originally joined Twitter and began her quest for followers with the help of 24-year-old grandson Donny Brandefine.
done. When I married, I told my wife Susan about the
~Miss. Foehser
I just spent the last 4 hours editing pictures, making notes on measurements, filling out my shop info, etc. Last thing to do before I'm ready is to put together an awesome giveaway for all the awesome support I've gotten through here in the last few months! There's definitely going to be a couple of Teesha Moore items (seriously need to come up with a new description for those - help?) as well as some other fun stuff I've been working on to put in my shop.
The frenetic quality of this hour – an example of what Jonathan Rosenbaum has called “hot time” – contrasts dramatically with the hours leading up to supper. Two o’clock is the hour of siesta, a time for slowing down. Three o’clock is the hour of watching time pass by in which nothing much seems to happen besides our anticipation of the working day’s end. Four o’ clock (finally!) is closing time. Five o’clock – the hour of transition. There is the journey home or to work; the night shift approaches; darkness approaches; sunset draws near. For some a time for winding down; for others a showdown.
Nicholas Green QC:
For any practical reasons and stereotypes, the biggest deal of doing what one truly enjoys might not mean living “happily ever after” – but it sure brings more happiness than being “useful” and “comparable”.
Have you ever made homemade cream of wheat? It does not even resemble the stuff you buy in the box and it is YUMMY, and so good for you. I made some this week and took pictures in case you have not tried it.
7. Diana Taurasi – Phoenix Mercury*
The Cabinet for Health and Family Services has long enjoyed a tremendous level of deference by most Kentucky judges. In my experience, both as a prior employee of the Cabinet and now as Court Appointed Counsel for parents and Guardian ad Litem for children, I have been concerned that the Cabinet’s reach lacks the ordinary checks and balances that limit other governmental agencies. One way this unfettered power has often played out has been for social service workers to insist that parents sign “Prevention Plans” or “Aftercare Plans” that the worker devises.
6.ain't got time to bleed
I have reviewed my new timeline, evaluated my proposed completion dates and on target for my May 15th implementation. My target audience will send a confirmation of participation on the 9th. They have been involved in a mandated initiative . If the target audience is delayed I will reduce the instruction time by half. I have also decided to ask my target audience to identify someone else that may be able to participate that has some knowledge of the Content Management System (CMS). I will modify my target audience If I am unable to get enough participants based my original description.
As for the left-over 10%, instead of leaving it sit and our bank account only to end up spent on something else come the following month, we should have applied that towards our debt. Every dollar needs a name!
Pew Charitable Trusts
We were a day late by this point but we got to have a belated beer day celebration with Icelandic beer.
This is humiliating. It's my first book and while I couldn't have predicted such a predicament, it's embarrassing as all hell to have to go through it. Because of the actions of the publisher, I can no longer support the sales of my book and have stopped all promotion.
Things to keep in mind:
Soak the corinths in the rum overnight.
Crawling From The Wreckage -- Dave Edmunds
He is accused of trying to “sell” the Senate seat, formerly held by President Obama. He certainly sounds like he is trying to make a deal for it. After all, it was “golden”.
When I arrived back at Milton Road, the fog had entirely lifted. In the flooded fields along Bearbrook, thousands of geese honked incessently, accompanied by quieter pintail. Strings of geese in the dozens and hundreds stitched the southwestern sky, probably drifting in from the fields east of Bourget. Far across the water, crows and ravens criss-crossed against a distant woodlot, and a turkey vulture soared, indentifiable only by the characteristic, shallow dihedral of its wings as it circled lazily.
Now that the days are warmer it is time to clean the ashes out of the fireplace one last time. I love the idea of putting something pretty inside the in the "off" season. Sometimes I use magnolia branches or baskets full of hydrangeas. The first image had me at hello. It's that color pink again pulling at my heart strings. I adore all the texture going on too. The rug and log stool lend the perfect textural balance to the pouff, acrylic coffee table, and pretty flowers. Brilliant.
I should have the order within the week and send them out to all of you by priority mail. I will keep you posted as I get my tracking number.
I coloured the pot with antique linen and stormy sky Distress ink and edged it with tea die. I used stormy sky and the small rosebud stamp to decorate the pot. I embellished the pot with hand made flowers, die cut leaves and part of a doily. I used Quickcutz alphabet dies for the letters.
The moment I saw these, I knew I had to make them. I have made them twice now. Since Sunday. It is only Tuesday. Hubby did take some to work and I did some to my mother in law's for supper last night. Cleo Coyle not only writes the Coffee House Mysteries, she manages to whip up some very tasty treats! Cleo did a guest post on Dying for Chocolate and that post introduced me to Chocolate Fudge Pumpkin Cookies. You only need a few items from the pantry to make these.
Hoppin' Frog B.O.R.I.S. the Crusher
It’s ok, I understand. We can’t help it.
Firstly it is disproved by the fact that it is primarily only the Africa colonies which are suffering, whereas many of those in Asia are booming, India for instance, looks set to become one of the major economies in the 21st Century. The Asians, for all their faults, took what we left them, ran with it and may soon overtake us. Of course, as older readers may have noticed, the advocates of white guilt focus almost exclusively on Africa these days, whilst ignoring the successful ex-colonies in Asia, like India and especially Hong Kong, which as a British protectorate became one the premier financial centres in the world, and remains so over a decade into Chinese rule.
Debra Faulk of Calgary
He sighed, though the sound came out more like a growl, and kept walking.
Strawberry smoothie is a very easy to make smoothie...It has got a tasty flavor and is a favorite among kids...
But we seen what cha did
I wish I did not know thus, for then I could have been
I realized that what I did yesterday was more than just show my husband how much I love him and honor him, it was also about showing my daughter how to love her future husband.
Demonstrations should not take place on any September 11ths and certainly not on weekdays, firstly to counteract any bans, and secondly to attract more numbers.
Heath Ledger, The Dark Knight
So, I became very uninspired and I threw together whatever was easiest. My family really didn't care but there were lots of nights that I brought what I had made to work and couldn't choke it down.
There is a story behind this image. Little Miss Naughty is me.
I was also at home crying hysterically, everyday for 22 weeks.
Anyway, I found beauty in the Quran. I don’t understand the language. I don’t recite beautifully, as well. But I found it peaceful to just read it outloud. The sceptics might say that it maybe because of the self-suggestion. Whatever. Those beautiful ayah (ayat, red.) are impossible to be made by humanbeing. Just too divine.
Vingo sale on the way!! (Yesterday's sale "Oh Christmas Tree" handpainted pendant is still on sale through today as well.)
Same thing: he calls me when the date is over. This time he has noise on in the background so loud that I had to comment. It sounded like porn. “Is that porn?” “Yes. I can’t turn the volume down.” And continued his conversation. I tried to go with the flow. Shush don’t judge. But the screaming kept me very unfocused. Doesn’t bother to pause it or anything that might make sense. So, I simply say “Is she screaming?” Quiet, then in a very breathy voice says yes. Nice! “Are you jerking off?” In shorter breaths says “I’m thinking about your ass!” Then cums. I naturally hang up, not because I don’t like a little phone sex. I just like to know that I’m gonna be participating. He continued to call me all night long.
Social Media isn't always beneficial to a business. Yes, having a twitter account for your business (or yourself if you front your business) can bring results - raising awareness of special events with the full details on your website for example.
. . . setting you free to live a pure and holy life?
We have much to do, but if you join us you will be fighting alongside us on the moral high ground of patriotism in defence of our freedom, democracy and culture, secure in the knowledge that you are fighting for the very survival of our nation and people’s future.
But she has a blog, so she randomly puts out this post.
There will be a raffle on the day with some fabulous prizes!
KK: You are my idol. But I'm six husbands and some big jewels behind. What should I do?
Since Brucey has gone into kindergarten he is more excited about learning new things,
in the intervals,
Most of the other instructions are uninteresting ("Don't forget to affix postage to your envelope"). But number 10 caught my eye: "FELONY NOTICE: It is a felony to accept any gift, payment, or gratuity in exchange for your vote."
~2 inch piece of ginger
Storytelling forms of InterPlay loosen me up. When I struggle to make the words tell my story, Babbling in a Made-up Language releases me from the pressure of precision. When I am running over with ideas, I Could Talk About is a form that gets the ideas out without requiring me to do anything with them; I just have to list them. If my body is stiff or my words are stilted, I can shake things up by telling Big Body Stories that involve movement or dance as well as words.How might improvisational play launch new creativity in your work?
For the Water Balloon Ice, we filled up small balloons up with water and froze them in my freezer. I didn't get the actual water balloons cause of their delicate nature to pop easily. Beware, they take up a lot of space in the freezer so make sure you have room.
On Saturday, Dr Chua and Guan Eng conducted a debate in Mandarin on the topic “Chinese at the Crossroads: Is the Two-Party System Becoming a Two-Race System?” at Berjaya Times Square.
Philippine Cup was long over, and everyone needs to move on.
"Sounds a lot better than this dump we're at," I remark.
Holy Cow. This book gave me the heebie-jeebies.
Seems to be that they're sending that email to any and everyone that has a blog.
Patent applicants who have their applications denied by the Patent Office have two avenues to challenge that outcome in court. One leads directly to the Federal Circuit Court of Appeals. See 35 U.S.C. § 141. The second leads to federal district court in an action against the Director of the Patent Office under 35 U.S.C. § 145. In this kind of action—truly, the road not often taken—the district court may “adjudge that such applicant is entitled to receive a patent for his invention…as the facts in the case may appear.” In a case argued to the Supreme Court this week, Kappos v. Hyatt, the Supreme Court has been asked to decide which facts “may appear” in the court proceeding—more specifically, whether a court may consider new facts that were not before the Patent Office, and whether the court must defer to the prior decision of the Patent Office regarding the relevant facts.
During World War II, Project Pigeon was American behaviorist B. F. Skinner’s attempt to develop a pigeon-guided missile.
As a child I saw many things I did not want to be.
I think scanning through that it might become apparent to folks that Wampus Country is in many ways supposed to be a 'fantasy America'. Whereas D&D often relies on 'fantasy Europe mishmash' (covering multiple centuries and jamming them together), Wampus Country is intended to be a comparable mishmash for fantasy America (squishing together the 17th-19th centuries in a fantasy setting). There's also a conscious choice to examine qualities which are said to be part and parcel of the 'American character' - rugged individualism, love of personal liberty, egalitarianism, social mobility, entrepreneurial spirit and consumerism, dedication to exploration, and a willingness to use violence. Some folks might use a faux-America in a fantasy campaign as a means of critique -- some money-grubbing imperial power, wasteful with natural resources, paying only lip service to high ideals. Perhaps you've seen GMs (or writers) do that pastiche. But I'm not interested in that. Wampus Country is not my critique of 'America', but my love letter to it. "...and to my faults, a little blind." I fully expect to get comments on this last bit.
Shall we vote for ‘leaving the PKFZ under curtains’ (likely the whole truth would be exposed about PKFZ in time by journos and researchers anyway) if the below 3 items could be granted :
And before I could do anything and as if he read my mind, he grabbed both my hands and said "Not now... we have plenty of time for this later".
The primary considerations at this step are to finalize the overall height, the radii for the front and rear curves, and placement of the doors in the side. After considering several options, we arrived at a 53" height that includes 3" overhang over the sides, 2" roof thickness, a 6" thick mattress, and 2" interior drop on the roof fan that will be installed later. This still allows for me (6'1") to reach over my head to change clothes while sitting on the mattress. In terms of the radii of the curves, we arrive at a 30" radius on the front, and 54" radius on the back. This seemed to be a good balance of curves with something that didn't look too egg shaped. Lastly, the door placement was decided to be as far to the rear as possible without encroaching on the wheels/fenders. The goal here was to be able to get in/out of the camper by sitting and turning, without having to shimmy forward/backward from a laying position.
The husband took him as, quite frankly, I'm rubbish at directions, maps and satnavs and just going anywhere off plan. My husband turns up in the Kia to a packed car park full of very well to do parents. The tournament is HUGE. My son is mighty impressed his name is featuring at the top of the score chart due to his surname. I am back home making cakes but constantly checking my phone for the results to come through. A bit like when you first meet someone and you're willing them to text or phone. I'm not even there and the tension is palpable. He has 6 matches to play which can last for 40 minutes but generally take 10 minutes, so there is a lot of waiting around in between. The husband reports back that many a rich kid are practising on their Ipads between games. My son is playing games on the husbands' phone to pass the time.
This component takes the cynicism out of your rear view mirror and truly allows you to support the Belief that is Component 1. When you trust yourself to be true to who you are and you trust the Universe to provide because of that truth, there is a release factor that must then take over your very being.
How does your family and friends view your work?
Also note how a previously disadvantaged individual compares the inferior environment his teenage children has to grow up in to what he was used to. Note how some whites proclaim that they are prepared to work together if there was a government interested in building a country.
It pours a rich dense jet-black color with a nice tan head. The flavor is much more robust than I had expected from a lager. There are aromas of dark-roasted, whole-bean coffee, bitter-sweet chocolate, and rich malted hops. There's also a smokey aroma that comes through on the nose and again on the palate. The mouth-feel is clean and round, and the flavor profile is dense with malt and coffee.
7) Spend time with pleasant people, kids, laugh hard when you get a chance.
I hate cleaning up barf. Your own barf is bad enough but cleaning up other people’s barf is barfable. Completely shamelessly, that goes for my kids too.
Councilmember Peter F. Vallone Jr. last week blasted officials at the city Taxi & Limousine Commission (TLC) for approving a plan to issue street hail permits to livery drivers – including drivers that can’t speak English.
They live with two greyhounds. One day, soon I hope, I’ll get to go photograph all four of them together.
There are so many reasons why I miss the States...
By this stage we very rarely saw mum anymore. She hardly ever left her bed, even less the room. She just laid there as the piss slowly spread, occasionally leaning over and puking up milky lumps onto the floor. Then she started locking herself in, and this is where the climbing out the window began.
Making 29 of these was a challenge. The worst part was when I was done and realized, "Um...what envelope do I use?" Epic FAIL! After a few panic-stricken minutes, I found that my local Paper Source had the perfect size.
I lost my Grandma last year on July 26th. I was with her until her very last breath. Sitting by her bed at the hospital listening to the machines beat slower and slower, watching her blood pressure and heart rate dropping lower and lowrr was the hardest thing I have ever done. I cried. A lot. I feel fortunate that I was able to see her and say goodbye before she passed away but I really wish she was still here. I am grateful for the time I was able to spend with her and I have many fond memories of her, I just wish she was here to see my wedding and hold my future children. She was a wonderful woman with a heart of gold.
I would say that the season premier does an adequate job of answering the questions from the previous seasons cliffhanger finale. It does leave me a little cold however.
Whether you believe that suffering is an extension of God's love or proof of his non-existence, personally I would endure just about any suffering to be loved completely. We all go down, surely some harder than others, but Murphy will not die from apathy, societal values, or a resignation of will.
This label is truly a labor of love. The zippers are RiRi, the cashmere is Loro Piana, and the wool... well... let's talk about the wool, shall we? Luxurious mohair and boiled wool previously next to impossible to find in the United States. But since everything is made in the US, it's been a such pleasure to contribute to the demand for more quality fabrics.
Someone causes you pain. They ruin your day….or maybe your life?
Huge.
The Swedish model recognizes that prostitution is an institution of inequality. Most people in prostitution enter as children after being sexually abused. Lacking education and resources to survive, often destitute and homeless, they are easy prey to pimps and johns. Sexism and racism lock them in, as in the United States, where African-American women and girls are overrepresented in prostitution, as are native Canadian women in Canada.
“No, thanks. I have prayed for a miracle. I’ll wait for my miracle.”
Today is also the release of the second edition of the Whimsy Stamps Inspirations Magazine! The magazine features never before seen samples and tutorials from our DT members as well as some creations from our customers and fans too! This issue is crammed full of crafty goodness and best of all it's FREE! Just click the link below and you will be taken to the magazine where you can read it online or download it and save to your computer.
I was an accidental expatriate. I sort of lucked into it. I was in my mid-twenties and finishing graduate school when I was offered an internship. One thing led to another and another and another and somehow or other I forgot to come home.
Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi: I conduct dialogue with the Christians, but if the Jews join the dialogue, I say “no” – until they lift their injustice from upon us.
“Welcome to ‘You Can’t Handle the Tooth’, I’m your host, Barry Jogbar, let’s go to the phones.”
The company my husband works for recently closed their local office. They offered us a relocation package and things for their Fremont, California office, which we declined after much thought and prayer. Then they offered him an opportunity to work from home. We were hesitant but so far we are really liking it!
"Because he wanted to, I guess. It's called the Book of Mormon."
I paid for being different. For doing things a different way. For behaving differently than every last person in the workplace. For not behaving identically to every last person in the workplace. I paid for being creative. For pouring my creativity into a nightmare job for 13 years. For pushing a program forward against the wishes of everyone. For not letting things be the same on the program as they were on all the other programs throughout the customer’s facility.
~Sizzle
1158. Threeway & Two Coneys @ Skyline Chili (Louisville, KY) 12:12 p.m.
28. Captain Jack -- Billy Joel
He is definitely not as green as he is cabbage looking....
Cast : Luke Wilson, Giovanni Ribisi, Gabriel Macht, James Caan, Jacinda Barrett, Kevin Pollak, Laura Ramsey, Rade Serbedzija, Terry Crews, Kelsey Grammer, Graham McTavish, Robert Forster, John Ashton, Jason Antoon, Martin Kove
Thank you, Judith Warner, for your level-headed look at parenting trends in the New York Times. Since I read Amy Chua's questionably titled "Why Chinese Mothers are Superior", an excerpt from her book which I will not be buying, I have read many responses to it. I do not care to judge how Chua chooses to raise her children. I don't care to defend "Western mothers" as a group, mostly because I don't even think there is a well-defined group.
The editors have agreed on six points, that will appear in Vogue’s June issue, which includes not knowingly work with models under the age of 16 or “who appear to have an eating disorder”.
The Prince of Wales has paid tribute to the "beauty of holiness" in the Book of Common Prayer as he opened an exhibition exploring the relationship between royalty and religion.
Although Kyra was stubborn, and sometimes mouthy, I found her to be more strong than any of the other characteristics. Yeah, some parts of the stories she had silent parties with the rest of the goths, involving drugs. But she refused to give her self away, and become a slut like her other two friends, as well as most of the school. I was happy for her.
"About Tagged.inc which also launched Tagged.com
At the start, I was one of those eye-rolling parents, cynically quoting how many hours we had left to endure and wishing away the days and weeks. But actually, I've really rather loved the summer holidays. Well, these last few weeks anyway.
God promised Abraham that Sodom would not be destroyed if only ten “righteous men” could be found I the city.
Then she went on to describe where her passion for life came from.
“It has been my greatest wish to do this and now I have finally got a chance to do this and I’m so excited, though at first I had cold feet and was very nervous,” added Chauke.
Stefan lures William to Romania. William’s situation and aging mother have left William financially wrecked - a perfect situation for Stefan to take advantage of.
Marinara sauce? Uhhh, ok?
He paused a while, breathing in and out, closing his eyes, voicing out to God with all he could.
DR MAROON: The Not So Smug Award? Ok, if you say so
Whilst most of the debate concentrated on local issues such as bin collections and nuisance noise and other environmental concerns, there was one point especially where the chasm between TUSC and the other parties opened up. This was when the candidates were asked how they would deal with the huge cuts to the council’s budget. Whereas the mainstream parties all took the cuts as happening for granted, with the Green candidate talking about ‘mitigating’ the impact of the cuts and the Labour candidate declaring “there’s no money in the city… we’ve got to be realistic”.
Funnily enough, Sandra didn’t need to ask her friends about their visits to the STD clinic. For she had kept the letter that she herself had received after conceiving young Darrell, possibly in the hope that it would remind her to behave with due care and attention in any subsequent liaisons with the coarser sex. The forged letter was quickly manufactured. The only remaining problem was how to get it into the bungalow, given that the ringmaster retained the only set of keys. I decided it would have to be a break-in, so I cased the joint after the ringmaster had locked up at mid-day. There was no easy way in – the only point of weakness was a small ventilating window that had been left open. Too small for anyone but a midget or a monkey – or Darrell the Squirrel!
While kneading it, you can add colour to the dough. I separated into two colours, green and red for Christmas.
Our Sponsor this week is Simon Says Stamp! We want to thank them for their continued support of Stampin Sisters in Christ! Check out their store for the best selection of stamps!
He used the money to further finance his research. He expanded his laboratory and hired an army of the most brilliant young minds to assist him. He learned how to identify defective genes, and he developed the technique for replacing them. He focused his attention on the code for immunity, and through many experiments learned how to create a super-immune individual.
I wouldn’t really have expected a murder mystery to be a hot bed of fashion but Fox’s The Finder has surprised me. While Geoff Stultz and Michael C Duncan run around finding specific objects that always solve murders and assorted mayhem the women around them dress with ease and adorability.
“The chicken,” said Bantum, looking down at the chicken whom he had picked up and carried off that way.
Over each the blanket spread, ample brownish woollen blanket,
Don't you think this is so much better than candy?! Heck yah I think so! For the candy lovers you can put a bunch of candy instead of spider or skull. Now that is some treat for your guests. Yum yum!!!
Here are a few snaps from the happy couples wedding day.
Quoth the Emir: 'Bethink thee, Charles, and see
Highlights – I got into the tension and emotion of the fight, and then, Bam – knockout!
I was now directly in front of the wall, and close enough to touch the packages if I wanted to. I didn’t; I couldn’t.
SURSUM CORDA! Lift up your hearts!
The first year I made them someone remarked that they were offended by the name, "Really, Shelly that's not very sensitive of you to name them Irish Car Bombs". For the record I am not trying to offend anyone or back any sort of political organization with baked goods. They were named after a cocktail. I didn't do the naming.
This most recent penny saving measure comes amid widespread cuts to education budgets across Spain that has led to regular protests in the streets by teachers.Okay, not nice, and even though you can always give your kids some bog roll to take into school with them toward the end of the month I can't help feeling there's probably a better place to make savings than on bog paper. On the other hand they are at least trying, whereas...
black boots
“Hey boy, come here.” The tall, slinky man said to Adrien.
Greece could end up leaving the euro, but that would make their economic problems far, far worse and it would be very damaging to the rest of the eurozone as well.
"Isn't this exciting?" Abby danced around, her hair flying everywhere. "We're finally going back, and this time to Xenith, too, just like Mum and Dad. I wonder what it looks like now."
The next morning I get up early and knock out another 3 rows knowing that the shit that I weeded yesterday already has more weeds coming up. I know they're new weeds because the ones I missed the day before are 3 times bigger. I checked my back when I came in, just slightly pink. Oh well, at least the weeding is saving me from my annual sunburn.
Bat Cookie Cutter or Stencil
Baby brew is coming along nice.
I arrived at the house where the mahatma was going to give those in attendance the secret knowledge early on Saturday morning. The place was packed with hippies. We all sat on the floor. It was a summer’s day and it was hot and we were cramped into this large one room spilling out into the hallway. The mahatma arrived and the session began. He talked all morning and most of the afternoon about how this knowledge was special and how the guru was the perfect master. He told us how important it was to practice this knowledge and then almost at the end of the day, and at this point everyone was exhausted, he began to dispense the secret knowledge. Before I get into what happened, I want to relay to you one incident that made such an impression on me that after almost 40 years I still remember it vividly.
Below is a recent example of 4 different concept sketches that were provided to a client to address the challenge of architectural side wall cladding and planting.
I'm still reading all of my usual blogs and even if I've not commented lately, I'm still reading your stuff and still applaud the great writing of my favorite bloggers (that would be you!) Keep up the good work!
Can't believe a week has flown by since my last post! Where did the time go???
Spring Creek Store - Located in the Portland Waldorf School, the Spring Creek Store carries all your Waldorf needs from books and school/art supplies to handmade gifts and gently used consignment.
Once I realized that a large amount of NLP is simply an invitation to think in new ways and discover new things that you can do (with communication, with learning, with your own mental strategies, etc), the whole field became clearer.
Sometimes its very irritating when people gape at you as you’re lying in bed, trying to memorise every detail, so they can compare notes with a fellow visitor. And don’t even get me started on the ones who just want to cross you off their list of visits that day!
I haven't done my black hole of cupboards yet, so I still have a bit of room for more stuff in here.
She'd had him since he was a kitten. Fate had brought them together. One day, she'd seen a classified ad in the newspaper. A tiger from a traveling circus had given birth to two kittens, and the owner was selling them. Sophie's father had left the family to -- seriously -- join a circus when she was eight years old. She often thought of him working with the big cats, and she believed she inherited her love of animals from him. Finding the kitten seemed like a cosmic gift from her dad.
When you take off the foil sheet the image will be foiled.
Friday was so fun. Claire, my second daughter, and I went on a little date. We had dinner and then went to see First Position. Claire's super obsessed with ballet and is working on memorizing the moves and positions (Her favorite one to say is Grand Jete - she has the accent down!). The movie was beautiful and inspiring. Such amazing talent in those dancers!
Dear Me
in the colorful city
For me, there've been different things at different times. Some seem constant.
My three tasks to do everyday were (1) to practice piano, (2) code my personal project, and (3) write in my journal. My first attempt was on a Thursday, the day after reading the article. Thursday went fine. Friday went fine. But then the weekend came and I derailed. Then on Monday, I focused myself on recommitting to doing this. So far it’s stuck.
Some more baubles. I also smeared out a thin layer of glue on the baubles and poured both fine glitter as well as Shimmerz Enamelz in Jack Frost for some additional bling.
Tidy round the house and then again and again.
4. I remembered how much I love Doctor Who. I seriously don't understand why I have not watched this show since my Freshman year of College. If you have never watched it, I strongly reccomend it. I know what you are thinking, and you are wrong. Go, watch it. Now.
But oddly, George is perhaps best remembered today for his half-hearted but successful campaign against motion pictures.
“At their meeting in Berlin in April 2011, Allied foreign ministers listed Japan as one of NATO’s partners across the globe. As such, in the framework of the establishment of a single Partnership Cooperation Menu (PCM) open to all NATO partners, Japan will be able to access a wide range of cooperation activities with the Alliance and develop a more effective individual programme.”
Keith’s only response was an undignified yelp. He bumped against the back of his chair so hard the legs lifted—but he didn’t fall.
To refresh your memory, here is where we began.... with a small, enclosed dining room.
The photo of super-dense frozen water is from Wired Science. Scientists have created the final predicted form of stable ice, called ice XV, in the lab. According to the Wired summary:
- A review of the Burns products under development by companies and universities/research institutes based on information derived from company and industry-specific sources.
Wednesday May 25th was our Busiest Day at Disney but also I think our most Fun!!!
I have taken the Myers-Briggs personality test multiple times and have gotten the same result. INTJ. I’m confident that this is an accurate portrayal of my personality, and every time I read about the INTJ personality, I find out a little bit more about myself.
Fun: 3/5. No one would be surprised that I loved it, but Fox got a little fidgety. Long walks in museums are not for everyone, especially if you have kids or Foxes in tow.
2010.09.10 Dagestan Makhachkala 1 0 An off-duty cop is gunned down at his father's home by Islamic radicals.
Wyatt lived briefly, touched many, and returned home to the Lord through death. Although returned through death, he is not suffering. He is free from hurt and pain.
"Mommy, see that sunshine outside?"
We had another great trip to Taiwan this year with many wonderful memories. I want to sincerely thank the fantastic tour group members with whom I was able to share many delicious meals and experiences with. I am so happy to have been able to teach you more about my beautiful homeland, our excellent teas and of course, the good cultural, shopping and eating experiences that we have. Thank you for making this such a fun and worthwhile trip for everyone.
I've asked God to show me when I'm doing such a thing, and to make me aware of it. I also have asked God to show me if I've done that to anyone recently so I can make amends with that person by apologizing. I've also prayed for God to help me forgive the person who hurt my feelings in this way. I don't want to hold on to any bitterness or hurt. I've avoided conversations with this person that could lead us down the same path. And I'm praying for this person as well.
According to the old cliché the only thing worse than people talking about you is people not talking about you. Unfortunately people have not talked much about Plaid, Independence or the alternatives to the political consensus recently!
Thank you all so, so much and see you on the other side!
We see the greater goal we want to achieve
It also blocks out the sight of the white wall of the building behind us.
Using the flat of your needle (not the tip), push the fabric gently downwards to fold it under. This is where finger pressing comes into its own...as you push the edge under the fabric will naturally fold to where it has been pressed making the needleturn a very easy step. Using your left thumb and forefinger to hold the folded edge down as you work will be a big help too. As you stitch around pull the 3/4 inch pins out as you come to them.
Well! Today they're giving one lucky reader a year's worth of manicures! That's 52 manicures total. The manicures can be redeemed in NYC, LA, San Francisco or Chicago. Anyone living outside of the four cities will win the cash value ($520).
“April 5, 2012 — Wow. It’s over. I’m in tears and so so so grateful for this unforgettable journey. My OTH family will be with me forever. Thank you all for your determination, loyalty, faith, hope, dreaming, and hearts. You have changed my life. Giant hugs. Xo Joy” (http://www.whosay.com/bjg/content/262559?wsref=tw&code=kly1Hlx)
And start working. They cannot miss a day.
“I know what it is like to be cloned, you know,” Benjamin Fulford told journalists on the scene, “and I can spot a clone a mile away, eh.”
Edna Cintron, 46, New York, N.Y.
Life’s history is often described as a progression because without a Creator, transforming hydrogen into humans required some kind of natural progression. One cannot climb a hill by falling down a hole.
I must be a great host.
Seven & The Ragged Tiger is full of promise and disappointment for me. New Moon On Monday is a good song with a good hook and the other songs are all good but Simon’s voice takes to whining all the way through. I listen to the record every now and then but always find it hard to take.
Fort Collins Brewing Major Tom's Pomegranate Wheat
The problem began a month ago when my bin was not collected. I do struggle with getting the bin out because of my hip and spinal problems not to mention my sore wrists that are arthritic.
Employees are an asset to any progressive organization. They become the essential work force that delivers the organization’s profits. The management should strive to make the establishment employee-friendly so that it becomes a sought after place to work in terms of productivity, company culture and profits. Listening to your workforce is one surefire way to have valuable inputs to your strategizing process.
"(Reconfiguration) includes, but is not limited to, the forging of the alliance as a strategic political centre.
There is great potential here. Sure, it’s a far cry from Tahrir Square or even Wisconsin. But there is the nucleus of a revolt that could shake America’s power structure as much as the Arab world has been upended.
Keeping your house warm depends on something you may not even think about, your house siding and insulation. Whether you choose fiber cement or vinyl siding, take some time to research the type of insulation you should use.
“Why, of course; it’s the sacred ebony stick stolen from the Indian temple, which is supposed to bring death to whoever possesses it. The hero gets hold of it, and the priests dog him and send him threatening messages. What else could it be?”
(Reporters Without Borders)
I used to blame it on anything or anyone, other than myself. Until you made me realize that I’m the reason behind my misery. The only person that’s destroying me is…..me. The voices in my head have messed me up. I have messed me up. It’s unbelievably cruel what I do to myself. And now I feel so distant, so disconnected from my own body. I’m running on empty, and I’ve given up. Please just, let me stare into nothingness.
Back to my point, the act of following Christ or the decision of following Christ is a voluntary act of us, the worshipper. This is where the how, why, when, where, what part of the method of doing it was in every point defined by the law and grace – the instructions.
Sadly (for us!) the fairy tale had to come to an end. The whole way home I told Dan I wanted a "do-over".... usually you want a "do-over" because something went wrong, and you want to correct it, but I wanted a do-over because we had such a fabulous time that I wanted to do it all again!!
Every year that we go to Grover, Jeff and I try to make it on our favorite four wheeling trail. It is called Sulfur Creek and it starts just a few miles from the cabin. This trail is so awesome. It takes you through such pretty scenery, where you eventually end at some cascading waterfalls and slick rock. Its the perfect place for a little picnic. Also on your way there, you hit sage brush that is at least ten feet tall. It is the biggest sage brush I have ever seen. These pictures are of Jeff and I when we reached the waterfalls. The pictures don't do justice of how cool these little falls really are.
I knew all these words for the longest time, and knew what they meant. I could teach on them. But now I have understanding.
Chipstead
Kudos to you dear Wife! Thank you.
At last! Discover the winners of Doctor Who Magazine’s annual season poll. What was the best story? Who were the best guest stars? And just who did you decide made the Greatest Contribution to Doctor Who in 2008? All is finally revealed!
3. It doesn’t matter how comfortable you are in the woods during the day. At night, that shit gets CREEPY. Especially when you have to go to the outhouse at three in the morning. Especially when the pack of coyotes has been hunting close to camp. Especially when rut has started and the bucks are getting stupid and sounding like something out of Clive Barker’s pet store. Especially when you spent the last twenty minutes lying in bed listening to THINGS stomp and creep around your camp, and finally you decide to take the revolver with you to the outhouse, because otherwise you are going to pee in the sleeping bag.
The craigslook ad for the Necchi was misspelled as "Neechi." There was one photo. Of the cabinet. Closed. And posted sideways. All it said was "Neechi sewing machine." No indication of model. And without a contact phone number or email. I kept clicking on the "please contact owner to notify them to add contact information."
5) This story is probably a parody, because if Pat Robertson had really said domething like this, he would probably have added something like "God can't smite all these bad people by himself, he wants you to send me whatever money you still have left to finance a gay-smiting mission."
And growing qualms
But whole humans don't like being told what to do. It just isn't in most of our natures. So when we see obedient children it's
We’re seeking a diversity of perspectives and topics. A few questions we pose as food for thought:
Undoubtedly, the most vivid institutional effort to achieve global reform that reflects the world we now live in rather than the one that existed at the end of World War II when most of the non-West was formally or informally operating under Western surveillance and control, has been the endlessly frustrating struggle to broaden and reconstitute the membership in the UN Security Council. It is scandalously anachronistic that the United Kingdom and France, at best secondary countries in the present global hierarchy, both hold permanent seats in the Security Council and enjoy a veto right, while countries such as Brazil, India, Nigeria, Indonesia, Pakistan, and Turkey must compete for the nine seats with two-year terms that are shared with the other 189 members of the UN. It is not only a problem of representation for important states, but also the fact that there is no Muslim or Hindu majority state that is permanently represented in the supposedly global body. At least with the UN there is an excuse that the Charter makes amendments almost impossible, prescribing that there must be total acquiescence in any change in the composition of the Security Council by all five of its permanent members, as well as two-thirds of the overall membership. I suppose it is far too much to expect that France and the UK would accept a single rotating European permanent seat, and relinquish their dysfunctional separate membership on the Council. In the meantime, the UN System is largely frozen in time, and the world is deprived of a more legitimate and effective global problem-solving capability that is desperately needed at this time.
Remember this guy from earlier in the week? He's some pot of gold isn't he? Let's cut right to the heart of the matter and see what you guys had to say about him...
your condescending baloney is what’s not funny
But I had obviously forgotten that the Blessed Virgin Mary, the Mother of God, who was the primary subject of today’s episode, can never disappoint. (Praise God.)
If you want to add trim to the under skirt do so now
If you could only have three tools to scrap with - what would they be? My Xacto knife, glue dots, and my circle cutters......I actually don't use very many tools when I scrap.
Well today was a beautiful day in the Pacific Northwest. Unfortunately to save my plants I had to use lots of pennies :) I am told the copper keeps the slugs away and they have already been playing havoc on some of my plants. I love daisies, all types, unfortunately the slugs love those, and I declare every bug for himself..
Pick #3: Thomas Cook
Hope you like these as much as I do :)
When I heard this would be an album start to finish gig and then a few hits I wasn't quite sure if I'd like it. In the end the 'album' was one giant 60 minute song and the 'hits' was almost the length of a regular set so it turned out to be pretty awesome.
To those whose twisted thoughts we’d rather label craziness.
My husband is very good at a lot of things.. Baseball, making smoothies, taking very good care of me, you get the picture. One of the things my dear Gabey has never been good at is the element of suprise. I won't say that it's because of his lack of ability to surprise, but more of his lack of ability to say no to me. If I ask him what he's hiding from me, he's not very good at keeping it a secret. (Also, I'm not very good at not prying information from his brain.)
attacking the medical profession per se. But he was wonderful, and understood exactly what the book was saying about communication and power, and agreed wholeheartedly. I was also afraid I wouldn't get an audience, as we were in competition with the launch of Nick Royle's Murmurations anthology (I was also sorry not be able to go to that), but the room above the health food shop Healthy Spirit was nicely full. We had an excellent discussion.
Laike is a one man project that started about 1,5 years ago. Laike consists of Christofer Ståhle who has played in several different bands for many years before the Laike project. Among other things he played the flute on the album ”Beautiful Days” by Majessic Dreams, released in 2008.
Notice how short the snail's foot is relative to its shell. Because of that size discrepancy, the snail can't lift its shell up when crawling on a horizontal surface. I have written about this before in this post. Nevertheless, the adhesion provided by the short foot is more than enough to support the weight of the snail's body and its shell when it's crawling sideways as you can see in the video or even upside down.
The people on there are probably freaks.
of the humble state of his servant.
in a box
3. Letter writing and petitions: Send letters and petitions to the heads of the organizations which are the target of your activism, and also to your elected representatives in Congress, the heads of appropriate government departments and agencies, and the White House. You can also organize email campaigns, but these are considered to be less effective. Bulk emails are regarded as spam, as something that can be ignored, but letters almost always generate a response. Indeed, such responses are regularly well thought out, even though the signature will almost always be stamped. (The point is, you have attracted the attention of someone at the organization: someone has been compelled to respond to your argument.)
Premier Access
Xypherous: At times, one must suffer so the many may benefit. The greatest advancement of our time has been achieved at great cost.
Well, my artsy-fartsy side of me comes out from time to time and this time I was inspired by my dad's approaching birthday! I have done just about everything for gifts for him--pictures, sentimental, gift cards, red sox paraphernalia....you name it, I've exhausted it! So I wanted to do something different this year (let's just hope it is good different). Here's what I came up with:
Rachel (Lea Michele) learned that she’s a finalist for the New York Academy of the Dramatic Arts. Read a lot of your fb post lastnight and many of you were not amused.
Hello my friends! I feel as though I've been missing from blogland again.
would you choose?”
with a FOR SALE sign
Leaves - fresh meadow, soft green
Highest vote, Doncaster Finningley, 1163, Nigel Berry.
Cuban grilled sandwiches with garlic mojo sauce
Finally, even if — as Keystone critics argue — some Canadian oil were refined in the United States and then exported, this would be a good thing. The exports would probably go mostly to Latin America. They would keep well-paid industrial jobs (yes, refining) in the United States and reduce our trade deficit in oil, which exceeded $300 billion in 2011.
Despite widespread criticism of this approach, it has proved successful in the sense that is has captured the public imagination and plenty of column inches. It is perhaps unsurprising then that, in 2012, the Opposition has (belatedly) jumped on the ‘something for something’ bandwagon.
The mango nectarine is not related to a mango at all. They’re called mango nectarines because they supposedly taste just like mangoes, both in flavor and texture. I’ll be the judge of that.
A tip - give at least 3 - 4 days for the lacquer to properly dry otherwise you won't be able to open the box easily. Am telling you this because I found out the hard way................won't tell you the words I used over this as they are not for your angelic ears.................lol
Based on pilot patient observations, and experience from the prior study KTS-1-2008, the investigators anticipate that chronic fatigue syndrome patients may benefit from B-cell depletion therapy using Rituximab induction with maintenance treatment.
Yikes! It has been a while. Too long. Life got very busy for me and my blogging suffered as a result. I am still new to blogging so it was an easy thing for me to overlook.
I go to my doctor's appointments on a weekly basis now. They put in a request to have me do my 38 week ultrasound, so hopefully insurance approves it. If so then I will try to have it done on Thursday, December 8 because I also have an OB appointment that day. Then we can discuss whether or not I will need to be induced early. I have a feeling he'll come early on his own though.
A perfect example of the fact that it is NOT only about the technicality but the emotion in a photograph.
John Smith’s Grand National Record: 2007 SILVER BIRCH (WON); 2009 Silver Birch (Fell 22nd); 2010 Backstage (UR 20th); 2011 Backstage (10th)
Malema urged a full hall in the Ehlanzeni municipal administration building to have as many babies as possible—“to prevent the revolution from losing steam”.
“Affirmative,” the voice replied.
1. Luke Donald. He can chip and putt like nobody’s business and that’s what it takes to win at Augusta.
2007, for trainer Roy Wilson, based close to McCammon’s home in County Antrim. He progressed in four further starts that season, finishing second twice before winning a Downpatrick hurdle in March, 2008, and then finishing a fine fifth to Kalahari King in a competitive handicap hurdle at the Punchestown Festival a month later. Wilson sent his charge to Carlisle for his chase debut in October, 2008 and Killyglen duly won, but his next start, at Ayr in January, 2009, came in the care of County Durham trainer Howard Johnson and brought an impressive win over Chief Dan George. Pulled-up behind Cooldine in the Grade One RSA Chase at the Cheltenham Festival next time, he proved himself a top-class novice chaser at Aintree three weeks later when easily winning the Grade One Mildmay Novices’ Chase over three miles and a furlong. The 2009/10 season commenced that October with a good second to the high-class Knockara Beau in a Carlisle graduation chase but things went awry thereafter as he was pulled-up in the Hennessy Cognac Gold Cup, a Doncaster handicap chase and the Scottish Grand National, although he did finish runner-up to Wogan in the Grimthorpe Chase at Doncaster that March. Killyglen returned to County Antrim for the current campaign and joined the team of trainer Stuart Crawford. With the John Smith’s Grand National being the ultimate target, Killyglen started last season in a two and three-quarter mile Thurles handicap hurdle in which he was a close second to Silverhand. Pitched into the Grade One JNWine.com Champion Chase in November, he made the running until four out and faded to finish fifth behind Kauto Star. Back over hurdles in a two and a half-mile handicap at Punchestown in December, he was four lengths third to Four Chimneys. Killyglen was fancied to run a big race on his latest start in the Grimthorpe Chase at Doncaster on March
2/3 cup whole milk
When the masters are sent to the label and all of what everyone did is reduced to an album credit, you’ll never lose the rush of hearing that record playing on the radio. Even someday 30 years from now, as background music in a shopping mall, the sound of that record will return you to that moment when you first pushed up the fader labeled Ld Voc and there was that magic.
If you can think—and not make thoughts your aim,
“The Famine immigrants were poorer, less skilled, and often in poor health compared to earlier immigrants, and their presence caused resentment not only among Boston’s native working class, but also among the city’s governing elite, who attributed the rising rates of crime, disease, and poor-relief costs to the arrival of the Irish.”
( 4 )
1. Stat categories that I can pull away in
However, lately I’ve been having a hard time getting everything down. It has been a struggle to just sit down and write. My writing group helped immensely because I had a deadline and not much choice. But now that I don’t have another deadline for a while, I can feel myself starting to slip again.
Go see Jack .....he has posted the most wonderful reminder that has NOTHING to do with this post. You can reach him HERE. Tell him Bombshell BLISS sent you!
We were at the clinic bright and early yesterday morning and in really great spirits. It is so nice to be able to have these procedures done at the fertility clinic. The recovery room and procedure rooms are nice and bright, and it’s a lot more relaxed. I even brought along my special blanket that a girlfriend sewed for me so while I was in recovery, the nurses covered me up with it.
The maestro followed this up with some of his Bollywood hits including O Re Piya (Aaja Nachle), Jiya Dhadak Dhadak (Kalyug), Mei Jahan Rahoon (Namaste London), Sajada (My Name is Khan), Teri Ore (Singh is King) and Surili Akhiyon Wale (Veer) to name a few. You could really see his talent first-hand as his fingers danced across his harmonium whilst he belted out notes and alaaps effortlessly.
Henk Smitskamp: Bass Guitar (tracks 11, 12, 13)
Row 10- don't finish off, ch1, turn work along edge, sc in ea row end and sc around putting 3sc in ea corner. Finish off.
1 usefulness
Below are several screenshots of the ring locations, (mostly emanating from NWS nexrad sites)… for a full explanation of what I have found that may cause this phenomenon.. here is the link to most of the information that has been found on the subject:
I warily tip-toed over to the window; the stars were glinting like precious stones in the velvet of the sky. Leaning out of the granite sill I peered down the street, expecting to see a stray dog wandering around, but there was nothing but the monochrome streets of Pompeii stretching far into the out of sight shadows.
another designer to "stalk." Monsieur Jean-Louis
Especially the bunny. I’m having a boy but come on – let’s not go there yet! I think while the room is pretty open I’m going to do a light sand on the affected places and repaint a closely matching or complimentary color because I like the color it is now (yes I’ll be very careful with the paint fumes). Or perhaps I’ll go wild and do something a little more like this, though more boy-oriented. The bottom doors are perfect so at this point it’s just the drawers and top that need help (I realize the top will have a changing pad on it but still – no bunny ears!).
I want you to help me find me, down to my core.
“Well, all of our products are at a great, affordable price & have free shipping! For the month of April we are lowering our prices even more due to our sponsorship here! Thanks so much for letting me share time on Little Chief Honeybee!”
The advertisement in question is reproduced above. His Grace would like to make it clear to the ASA that he is now reproducing this allegedly ‘offensive and homophobic’ advertisement as an educative illustration of allegedly offensive and homophobic advertising; not as an offensive and homophobic advertisement per se. Naturally, His Grace apologises in advance to all those who find this educative illustration offensive and homophobic, for it is never his intention to be either offensive or homophobic. But those of you who do find it offensive and homophobic are free not to visit His Grace’s blog whenever you wish.
Slit whole chilies and remove the seeds; rinse and dry. Lay whole chilies, skin-side down, in a lightly greased 13x9-inch baking dish; sprinkle with half of each cheese. Top with chopped chiles, remaining cheese, salt and pepper. In a bowl, combine eggs and milk; pour over top. Bake, uncovered at 350°F for 45 minutes. Serve with salsa or sour cream, if desired. Serves 8.
As we sat down at our computers, 'A' was in front of me, and his computer started beeping like one of those heart machines attached to a dying person. Nervously he looked around, and realized he had no mouse, so I whispered to him, "there's one at the back". I meant, 'just change computer mate', but no, he got up and disconnected the mouse from the other computer, came and sat back down, replugged it in, and the beeping continued. I felt especially bad when latecomers came in and sat at the back, and when we began actually using the machines started bleating 'Madame, someone has taken our mouse! We have no mouse!' Poor A just sank lower into his chair, and I felt as if I had caused the whole debacle, whilst simultaneously being amused by it. A reminded me of those characters in films who are held responsible for some horrible event, but are unable to express that their error was made in ignorance, not evillness, and so eventually get hunted down and murdered by the townspeople.
John Manlick 26
The study's authors based their findings on data collected from the Chinese micro-blogging site Sina Weibo. While Twitter has a purported 300 million users worldwide, Sina Weibo has 300 million in China alone. Even with the rampant Chinese government censorship, Sina Weibo's stock has soared recently with news that 50 million of its 300 million users have joined in the past three months alone, making it the third most popular site in China.
Nearing shore, we manoeuvered our slim crafts to beach side-by-side, hoping to avoid last summer's dousing arrival, the spilling-out of each of us into the lake. And success! Legs unfurled, stretched to regain a flow of blood, we stepped onto land with not a drop of water where it didn't belong. Heaved the kayaks to the roof of the car, strapped and buckled-down each one, and paddles & skirts & life-vests tossed in the back.
I had a post all in my head, I am about to embark on something fresh and new...
This is a twisted easel card. The picture shows it open. Here is a link to the video tutorial on how to make this card (this tutorial is not made by me):
I noticed I did not leave enough dry time in between coats of polish with some other polishes I was using few weeks back cause I ended up with air bubbles. Now I wanted to make sure each layer dried fully before adding on a new layer. It took a few hours cause I deliberately took so long.
So needless to say, this past weekend he came home with one for me! Now I am trying to figure it all out.
Yeah, right, like that moment’s gonna happen! Let’s just pretend the reason for the season is first and foremost in the minds of many with another imaginary Christmas gift-giving conversation.
Official CD release by Dark Adversary in on November 15, 2010. Limited to 500 copies.
It also suggests “If you want to be successful and not waste your time do this: 1. Talk about your hobbies. 2. Talk about your goals/aspirations 3. Talk about yourself and what makes you unique. 4. Your taste in music.”
And too much of that Slurpee mix ain't good for me, even though in my life I've probably had three total Slurpees. Of course I had something Blue to celebrate the rare occasion.
Pre-heat the oven to 180*C/350*F. Lightly butter a 5 cup ovenproof ceramic dish. Set aside.
Hilariously enough, we planned every detail except for how far we would actually run. Being as how I’ve eased up on the running since my half marathon a few weeks ago, I was a bit uneasy about not knowing this one weeeeee lil’ detail.
Are you suffering? Are you prospering? Don’t be found in yourself. Let others find you in Christ, no matter what your circumstances are. Do you think that Paul was in prison, hanging his head in defeat? Would Cesar’s household have believed into Christ if Paul was murmuring and complaining about his poor circumstances? By no means! He was there, in prison, expressing the unsearchably rich Christ, through the superabundant and all-inclusive Spirit. Paul was not a super-believer, he was living the normal life in Christ.
One thing that really opened my eyes concerning my skills as a wife and really made me want to try harder to be the best wife I could possibly be was a quote from the second wife/marriage book I read (Created to be His Help Meet by Debi Pearl). I cannot remember the exact quote and I am having trouble finding it, but it goes something like this..."Would you want your son to marry someone like you?"
Well, just went to BAGC Grad show alone. Chat awhile and I found out I’m really chatty after spending a day with myself. Ha! (I know even I don’t I’m already very noisy on normal days-_-)
For decades, Americans relied on oil to heat their homes. Please read this article to learn more.
Enough chit-chat. Let's get to the card.
4) Sift the flour into a large bowl with the oats, and remaining 1.5 tbsp of almonds. Add the oil and mix it altogether well until it starts to clump together.
little white tree from target placed on my bamboo console (from target, this year. it was only 2.50!). i had those little tiny ornaments from last year, and i kept it to only orange and silver ornaments:
Third theme: this melody was firmly determined to make me sing it again and again in the night.
but for him, for my baaaaaby boy, it was a big deal.
does gratitude and sacrifice live with love in you and in those who claim to love you? i hope so. if not, i hope you will find that kind of love and strive to love that way, too.
I went straight at the stop light, drove up the road, pulled into the driveway. I parked the van, popped open the door and was carrying my groceries up to the door when I realized... I don't live there anymore.
Stack the States
I'm so enjoying being part of the Sketchabilities team. I find Karan's sketches so easy to work with. I see the sketch and I just get inspiration. I chose to do this one of Nicole and Ryan. Even though they are almost five years apart in age, they have been the best of friends from the beginning. I have never seen them utter a harsh word at each other or raise their voices. They have supported each other, and even with Nicole living away from home now, all I hear is how they text or call each other daily. They may live far apart but still remain as close as ever. Ryan has always just called her "Sis", and on her wedding day he gave the toast to the bride and started his speech with "Sis", lol. They are both so special and I love when the two of them are together.
I decided to try the Tequila and Lime Turkey Chili. To be honest, I've made chicken chili, and turkey chili before. I found them to be lackluster in flavor. However, the fine folks at America's Test Kitchen promised that they had a few tricks up their sleeves that would yield a moist and flavorful turkey chili. As luck would have it, I had all of the ingredients on hand. So, the night before, I prepared the chili. The first step is to make a "panade" of white bread soaked in milk. This prevents the lean turkey meat from becoming dry. I needed fresh oregano and garlic cloves.
You started it all
“Oh, but their policies are different enough that you shouldn’t waste your vote voting 3rd party!” (Yes, I’m going to beat this dead horse for as long as I can.)
This year’s first round felt like a giant primal scream. The scream began when Nashville’s Shea Weber rammed the head of Detroit’s Henrik Zetterberg into the glass. It picked up volume after the Rangers’ Carl Hagelin took out Senators captain Daniel Alfredsson, culminated with the Torres hit and in the days that passed before his final suspension was announced. By then, things seemed different than they had ever been before. You could hear it in the intensity of the talk on sports channels, on mainstream channels, in newspapers, and on the streets. Players going down one after another! What’s going on here?
Cause I love the way it feeds me
Secondly, the leper also kneels. Kneeling is a biblical gesture of our dependence on God. It implies that we are incapable of accomplishing certain things. Kneeling is in fact the posture of redeemed people. Only those who have tasted of redemption can kneel to the God of Scriptures. The leper knows that this is outside of his control. At times we want to fix everything. We think everything is in our control. We are the captains of our ships, masters of our souls. But God is the sustainer of our lives. We owe him all that we have and are.
I could have set a budget but I love the building and wanted to make homes that I would want to live in myself. It’s probably not a very good developer way of looking at it
Over at the Ribbon Girls blog we're having a very patriotic red, white and blue give away - all you have to do is be a follower and leave a comment! Easy as that!
So why the title of my post and the extensive write-up? Well, I needed to give you a little insight into why I am now so darn happy with the latest developments in my life. You see, for the last two years I’ve been battling to get the last of my baby weight off since the birth of my second child. It’s grated at me, kept me awake at night, made me extremely self conscious, stopped me from going out with friends, or even wanting to get intimate with my husband. It’s fueled another depression (although there are many other factors), and it’s added to a great deal of physical & emotional stress that I’ve experienced.
Which brings us up to now. Full time Mom, Maid, Chef, Taxi Driver, Home Management Specialist, Laundress, Accountant, Blogger, and Craft Maker.
Because Jasmine is too long.
The USPTO and NIST have launched a new IP Awareness Assessment Tool aimed at helping small businesses, entrepreneurs and independent inventors improve their knowledge of all forms of intellectual property.
We also exercise most days: running a mile (having worked up to that over about three weeks) and then hitting the tennis ball for the dog to chase. The kids either run after the dog or dribble a soccer ball (N) or wander around the grounds...meandering. It's good to just GET OUT. This takes about 45 minutes.
Huntsman: hey you try running for the
Their latest offering are crunchy cookies in four flavors; chocolate chip, double chocolate, vanilla honey graham, and sugar crisp. All four were a huge hit with all five kids as well as mommy and daddy. I'm especially fond of the Double Chocolate cookies and our oldest son was caught hiding the Sugar Crisp ones. In fact, all the kids were a little sad to leave these treats behind when we set off for our big trip.
Wasn’t Polanski’s comment an indication that his film was meant to put Americans in his shoes? Everybody already knows about the hardships he suffered in the late 1970s’s, when he was a respected Polish filmmaker who had suddenly found himself lost in translation at the center of a damning Los Angeles legal system. Seen today, Frantic plays sort of like Polanski’s sweet vengeance against the United States; he seems to be asking his audience, “How would you like it?” The film is full of eccentric characters that loom in the background and stare at the hero with a devilish glee, enjoying the heck out of giving him a hard time. The French police howl at his fury. A cackling Jamaican accosts him in the stall of a men’s bathroom. A dog watches him from the front seat of a taxicab, salivating at his curious demeanor.
When we lift ourselves from the habitual mind, we create new neural pathways into unchartered territory. Those new neural pathways that come from our Conscious Creative Self are so much brighter and truer, and they feel so good. What new pathways are you making in your mind and heart today?
So for today, these are some of my favourite things that start with the letter A:
Canned fruit cocktail. Again, another childhood favorite. I craved this when I was pregnant and I remembered how good it was. The real treat was the cherry halves. It sucks that they only include like 1 or 2 of them though.
“Sure, let me know when you get home from work. Shower, shave, straight to bed.”
The first one is a dartboard great for those men's cards . Lots of cutting out but worth it.
On the basis of the foregoing findings, the trial court, Judge Magno S. Gatmaitan presiding, dismissed the petition for certiorari, stating:
- Splitcoast Stampers
Date: Wednesday, January 7, 2009, 6:05 AM
Louisiana state senators voted against the urge and request for public hearings on certain education legislation to be held on certain days and times on March 20.
I hurried to the back of the little house and pulled out every suitcase I could find and stowed everything of value. Books. Pictures of me with newsmakers. Cloudy memories of trips abroad, war zones, interviews with generals and dignitaries who went on to fame or perished in motorcades that didn’t make it through IEDs.
The performance of certain types of books, much like certain types of financial instruments, is cyclical. Vampires were cool in the middle of the last decade (and are still cool to some extent). Is this the first time this has happened? Absolutely not. (I mean, who doesn't remember the vampire riots of the 1720s/1730s?) Is this the last time this has happened? Also absolutely not.
Be patient.
Mr Mitchell ended up back in hospital in Dartmouth, Devon, and was eventually invalided out of the navy because of his injuries - but no-one picked up his stray bullet wound.
It is really hard to miss one whole week of your life... Sun. I had to go back to the ER, the good ER I was not feeling right they think I was having a reaction to the med's or, maybe it is just nerves I mean hello I almost died an I am NOT sleeping well at all. I am afraid to go to sleep and never wake up again... I do feel better today and over the weekend we had a really nice bar be que at my SIL and BIL's house and they asked my sis and her family as well as my niece and her family this has really pulled the people I love the most together. as well as my SIL niece and husband I think of her as my other niece as well as my SIL's mum and pops thats what i call them with much love...
I'm moved wards. I feel a bit forgotten. My second day there and I am drugged up to manage the pain.
*OO. Scary bicyclist. One day, scary bicyclist, you won't be flipping off the lady laughing at your sad antics from inside the Buick. You'll be flipping off an undercover cop, or a delivery truck driver in a hurry, or my buddy Chris, who'll flat stop his car, jump out and beat you into a screaming, crying pulp with a jack handle. He is OUT there. And he doesn't care. You already made him late.
Convertible coffee tables are practical and attractive. They're available in many stores, but the internet is probably your best choice for shopping for this household item. You can browse through many online stores and compare prices and styles, as these do come in different styles. Their functions are so varied that this is definitely something you'll want to get for your home.
The left channel on the cassettes is generally weaker than the right and I addressed this using the Saffire's analogue pre-amps. "Unreal" shouts a guy near the taper, clearly moved by the conclusion to Comfortably Numb. Listening to this you can really appreciate what he meant.
We were sitting on the sofa, music playing, eating strawberries, slowly, deliberately. Albert put his arm around her and started kissing her, very gently. Then, she closed her eyes and kissed me, entranced. The clothes went off in an instant. She was wearing red lingerie and thigh-highs. She was gorgeous, with her tiny little waist and her tiny little pussy. Albert went down on her first, then I did. She started breathing faster as I was sucking her clit. We went upstairs and fucked, very sweetly. Albert laid on his back with me sitting on his cock and Lianne on his face. We then switched, and switched again – she was fingering me slowly while Albert fucked me. He came. We cuddled, then went to sleep, exhausted. In the morning, I started caressing her and asked her if she wanted me to go down on her. She nodded enthusiastically. She tasted like metal. I kissed her sweet tight pussy, while Albert was fucking me from behind, I kissed her and liked her until I couldn’t feel my tongue. Albert started to finger her while I was sucking his cock, and he’s amazing with his fingers. His curved fingers went for the G-spot, and, a few minutes later, she came hard. Her second ever orgasm with someone else. We were so thrilled that we almost high-fived – yay for teamwork! Albert has a thing for double blowjobs, so I started sucking his cock, then asked Lianne to join me. We took turns. He came in my mouth. The end. Albert then made breakfast, while Lianne and I stayed cuddled up in bed. It was very sweet.
“Discussions over discussions, reading and comparing, black and white, stars evoked and as the spirits of many great choreographers and critics began crowding the already limited space, the mist began to dissolve. I wish I could say it was a dark and stormy night outside, but in fact the sun was shining and so were the tempting cookies served. Glucose fuelled, we worked hard to weigh up opinions against opinions in fruitful dialogue with Hutera who played the perfect host tackling the right question; Even though journalism might mean many different things, it appeared that most important was for the journalist to be touched by the events. Thus, a journalist is a highly sensitive being interested in real life and emotion. But again, this does not apply to everyone: simply talking about life.”
Two things come to mind about this verse. The first is the symbiotic relationship between the government and the governed. The other is the fact that it is God who puts or allows governments to be in power regardless of the form they take. However, the choice of governments is obviously left to the people unless we expect God to descend from heaven and impose His will in the forthcoming general elections or GE 13.
Hungover (aborted)
I just found out about The Carousel, the resurrection of a historic relic (you can read about the sweet history on its website) and I was determined to pay a visit now that the weather is warming up in NYC. With all the endangered places being threatened to be torn down (we’re looking at the lost of the good old days of Coney Island, the gentrification in old neighborhoods, and all the mom and pop stores shuttering due to high real estate costs), it warms my heart that we are at least doing ‘something’ to preserve and value the past.
Rose was a rescued Dalmatian, blind in one eye & adored by a guy who seemed better suited for the California coast – I would have sworn he was a surfer, dude!
And it’s going to get worse if something isn’t done soon to lift the bureaucratic strangulation being applied to the oil and natural gas industries by Obama’s Secretary of the Interior Ken Salazar.
I've heard His laughter in the joy of family fellowship.
Pyramid Breweries
I wanted to bake something different (No chocolate) and got my hands on some desiccated coconut. You know I was obsessed with strawberries for a while but as the summer trudges along, mangoes are now, holding my interest! I wanted a nice nutty and nutritious tart base and had some ragi flour lying around (I had earlier used it while making biscotti and it had imparted a nice nutty, almost chocolaty flavor to my biscotti) - so in it went with a small amount of almonds and butter and that was my tart base. Now, all I needed to do was think of a filling and was very inspired by www.smittenkitchen.com!
End of story? The plumber came. He fixed stuff. He charged me a lot of money to fix stuff. He did not charge me nearly what it would have cost me to replace floors and ceilings. BugMan2 completely erradicated the ants with one try. I am pretty darn certain that BugMan1 never even sprayed the pantry which was the entire reason he was called to my home.
So yeah, I'm pretty proud of this book. I'm mostly proud of the way the process has changed my life, and how it's helping our readers to expand their horizons and feel hope for their own financial futures.
The above picture was sourced from a forum on: www.4x4community.co.za, and was brought under my attention vie email (with pics) about 30 minutes ago. I noticed that it was a left-hand drive vehicle and quickly checked the validity of the story.
Maisa: You are impossible.
The postwar arrangement, Packer notes in passing, didn’t deliver for everyone: if you were African-American, or a woman, you’d probably find those postwar years something less than Edenic. I’d add other groups to Packer’s list, especially gay people, who are only now beginning to gain something like equality and something like a public voice. But for many people, the establishment seemed to deliver a decent life, with relatively secure employment and relative egalitarianism, with inexpensive public universities, and wealth far less polarized than it is today (we’ve gone from a postwar 40:1 CEO-to-worker pay ratio to a ratio of more than 400:1).
All the How-to-write books advise you to “write what you know.” (laughter). As a gay man, it was important for me to get a positive story of two men in love and committed out there and for me that meant a story that wasn’t just about sex or romantic love but about friendship and family. I think we all have romantic dreams (God knows I do) but few of us actually live them. I wanted to show a romantic couple also faced with reality. They are perfectly happy when it is just the two of them yet when Dondi falls ill they take him in without a second thought. At one point when Dondi is sickest, Thomas mentions he and Matt no longer have the energy for sex, yet their love for each other never wavers.
Righteousness – a life lived with God’s priorities in view, delivers us from death. No, not the grave, but from a living death. Living your life in God’s will for you will keep your relationships from dying. It will keep you from an unfulfilled life. Then, in your later years, you can look back with no regrets.
The reason this rejection is such a victory for the people of the Athabasca Chipewyan First Nation is simple, without adequate delivery methods for tar sands oil producers will be choking on the oil they plan on or currently mine/produce. Without massive pipeline allowing for cheap transportation of oil major oil companies, like Shell, will be left holding hundreds of thousands of barrels of oil with no method to transportation. Current tar sands transportation lines cannot adequately handle the proposed expansion and increases development in tar sands production.
Clapperclaw – To scold, tongue-lash, scratch or fight in an unskilled manner.
JPSA reaction
Am I a GOER? A “goer” is one who, well,… goes. They are the ones overseas that we usually call missionaries. Paul and Barnabus throughout the book of Acts are clearly those who go. Short term mission participants GO. These people are on the front lines, on the scene and where the action is. These are the mission equivalent to those who joined the armed forces after 9/11–they just had to go!
”Uh…hello.” he stammered and put a hand up to wave
Secondly, JustUs has gotten it's first two festival acceptances! Miguel Rodriguez of the Monster Island Resort podcast (and one of the nicest people I've met!) accepted my film to his event which is called Horrible Imaginings. It takes place on the weekend of November 4 in San Diego and last night, the Canton Film Festival in my birthplace of Canton, Ohio, accepted JustUs AND the music video Sine to their festival! And "Sine" just played the Black Rock Film Festival in Nevada over Labor Day weekend! That city doesn't exist outside of Burning Man!
specializes in purchasing sub-
When removing the 1st repeated segment and splicing together SideA and SideB, I noticed that even though the two sections are repeated when they were copied from the source, SideB's left channel was much lower than the right for 10-15s before the level returned to normal. Given this is the same source tape, seems like a person must have changed the levels on the left channel after he flipped the tape before eventually correcting the level. So I adjusted the gain on this segment to smooth the transition between SideA and SideB.
We would like to cover the above herbs in the blogs to come, for now we shall focus on chickweed because it thrives in the winter.
Go on bike rides to my friends houses..
An Eagle article from March 3, 1888 explained in the ins and outs of this custom:
Jack being his impatient self waiting for his turn on the boogie board.
blog, I couldn't resist in making her my new banner. I really enjoyed
5. Make a set of swatches out of the materials you use a lot and test them for yourself. Test not only the paints, pens and pigments, but also the paper, varnishes, and fixatives. Try them in all kinds of combinations so that you have an experimental control, and also you can see what happens with various interactions.
That joke comes courtesy of “The Naked Jape”. According to the cover it is “the only joke book you’ll ever need” and “a wide-ranging study of comedy”. Well, informative though this book is, family joke book it is not. One author is an atheist (or perhaps a very lapsed Catholic) and the other certain that “God has a robust sense of humour” and I think this is reflected in the content which veers between the outrageous and the plain funny. Some of the jokes I was comfortable sharing at family mealtimes but others are of the sort that make me switch channels on the TV.
As you are flying to New Orleans for ALA, be sure to acknowledge your library-brethren/sistren -- the flight attendants. Like you, these kindred spirits teach in small, confined spaces; they express an obvious boredom with teaching the same lesson over and over again; and their lessons are directed to patrons who blatantly ignore them.
uniforms as fashion well predates the Millenials, but these days I can’t walk down the street without passing someone wearing camo, or else a designer coat based off old field jacket. Hell I have an entire closet devoted entirely to camouflage just for day to day wearing.
The employee, Joy C. Noel, filed suit in Manhattan federal court on Monday against the world’s fourth-largest agency holding company. Also named in the suit: Interpublic Chairman-CEO Michael Roth; former Senior VP-General Counsel Nicholas Joseph Camera, former VP-Associate General Counsel and Assistant Secretary Marjorie Mary Hoey; and Carolyn Harding, Interpublic’s director of human resources in the U.S. and Latin America.
The point I am trying to get at, is that I never knew what real poverty is like. That is until a friend told me about his family, who is a lower class Thai.
Mail Order:
‘No.”
“We are digital immigrants. Our children are digital natives.”
This was very exciting.
"A little."
I finished up on my Green Seascape yesterday:
I kept my lips zipped .. I was being Argentine.
Soulless Chef: "What if I force-fed a duck until it got so fat it burst?"
So this isn't exactly a "fave" but I am trying to use it up. I bought it when I couldn't find my beloved Marcelle liquid liner. I figured I'd give this on a chance. It's okay overall, but the black is a bit weak, the product doesn't flow into the tip properly and the pen is so short it's awkward to hold. I have a Lancome Art Liner to use next, even though I prefer the pen style as opposed to ones that need to be dipped ink well style.
“Gingrich shuffled pointlessly through a zoo in Asheboro, N.C., a peacock with faded plumage, still preening and still campaigning, though the attentions of most reporters and the affections of most voters had moved on.
If my time away is as productive as I think it will be then my return post will hopefully be to announce the completion of my first draft.
Earlier this month I taught a residential course at Lumb Bank with all its framed hand written Ted Hughes poems and walked the short but steep road into Heptonstall to the churchyard where Sylvia Plath is buried - her grave a mess of dying flowers and pens - a huge jar of them spilling out onto the gravel. Ah yes the past is all about people.
I don’t know how many times I have to repeat this to myself (almost disbelieving and shocked).
Mincing & Whisking Instructions (the old school way)-
It is a corny ABC Family tv show about these high school aged gymnasts trying to qualify for Nationals. I thought it would be intresting given my childhood involvement in competitive figure skating.
-Stories can be archived for later play
We are now trying to decide if we should get a bath chair. I was thinking of the Otter Bath Seat - as it's less expensive, and seems to have enough straps to keep him safe:
I don't have a sister, but if I did, I'd want her dating and marrying men of character. I'd hope she'd want to, too.
The 2010 Ethnic Minority British Election Survey (EMBES) was directed by Professor Anthony Heath, Professor of Sociology at the University of Oxford. The headline results, which you may have read, were:
Instead, the more I look
It’s that unbounded awareness subjectively,
So, now governments, including allegedly civilized, Western ones, will rip children away from their parents for the reason that they don't like the food that the parents feed the kids.
Nope. I am simply tired of chasing. I chase a lot. Its my nature. A Gemini love adventures and always needs something new to keep then interested. And let me tell you something. Chasing got sooooo under rated.
“In the kitchen,” I'd tell.
and some b&w Bazzill, dymo and October Afternoon alpha stickers.
Offered over the internet, for the average person an annual payment of thirty-eight dollars will be all that will be required for full-time membership. This will include, at no extra cost, our monthly bulletin and of course the chance to use the Lodge Mason jar from time to time.
1-Orange Julius
Admirable Theft Auto: The Ballad of Gay Tony 3
I think a big part of Getting A Grip is about knowing what your best path is. In my case, that's often the path of least resistance. I feel like when a decision is full of "no" then it's not the right decision for me. It's important to be able to identify your comfort zone, even if only to be able to know when you're out of it. A comfort zone isn't necessarily a rut. Make your comfort zone a starting point.
In this book, Platt talks about taking back your faith from the American Dream. How can we live a true biblical life, just sitting comfortably in our own homes. We've become so materialistic in our every day lives we haven't even realized it! We have above and beyond the necessities that we need for every day living, yet we still want more! Platt, talks about how it's a constant battle to resist more things that make life more comfortable. We even have to have these comforts in our Church buildings, padded seats, air conditioning/heat, lights, screens, music. If we took all that away Platt asks, "would just the Word of God be enough to continue meeting together?" He talks about his experiences overseas and how there are so many people daily meeting in underground churches. They are risking their lives for the sake of meeting together to worship God; but here we are in America, in our comfortable houses, comfortable churches, unwilling to step up and take a little risk ourselves. This book is a "Radical" eye opener to the life that we should be living but are not. If you like a challenge, and want something more in life,this book is for you!
By Douglas McClintick, 16
Sugars 0.7 g
Jen: Twenty seconds...Why should everyone read WHAT A BOY WANTS? Other than you being as awesome as you are. That and the amazing friends you have *winks at Jaden*.
Wrap her Up
I finished the Carlo Biagi Charms section on the website and you can find those beautiful sterling silver clip on charms here: Carlo Biagi Charm Collection
to pick me up that afternoon so I only had time to grab
And here's a reminder to enter my giveaway! If you tell me about the document camera and/or projector you use in your classroom, you can enter to win a $10 TPT gift certificate! Click here to enter...there are four days left.
Giordano noted that the DEC recently completed hydrology tests at the site and has sent the results to the Parks Department for review. The Parks Department statement indicated that the agency is “currently reviewing the hydrology report and will share with DEC once our review is completed.”
Previous technologies, weapons and surveillance systems have added to the power of the Government (the 'man,' if you will). Dick saw that at some point technology might emerge that would allow for subversion of the dominant, authoritarian power structures. Kids might become so versed in technology that they could 'play' in a virtual world, while at the same time righting the wrongs and injustices of the world by short-circuiting any system that requires submission through intimidation, misinformation, or apathy.
'Please ring in the first place for details' - actually means once we have spoken to you we will ask you to send a CV, could have been said on the site but we wanted you to waste the cost of a 'phone call.
- My wife says: I would be probing Dr Eleanor to know who the father is.
Iván Meade - What project has given you the most satisfaction?
The initial thought Emily had was a red and black theme but out of the blue she changed it to Purple and black.I have suggested silver as an accent to brighten things up a little and she agreed. We have to spray some of her picture frames silver and do some art to go in them for her walls.There is a chrome bedside lamp and Cd player and I will get some cushions or make them if I can't find them cheap enough.
Ok. So Malik is not bad looking.
To the nose of a dog yet swift,
became my beacon and my hope.
In the upward air where their eyes turn,
First up was the Aprihop with a cheese from Spain called Drunken Goat. The pairing was decent enough, but it didn't really sing to me, so to speak. The Red & White, however, went splendidly with an Australian blue cheese called Roaring 40's Blue, with the fruity flavors of orange and Pinot Noir juxtaposed against the formidable funk of the cheese. Raison d'Etre and Black & Blue were paired adequately with a French cow cheese and an Italian sheep cheese respectively.
Darkness, under a full moon
One problem I continually struggle with is the folks who want to up the definition of session to include 5% and even 5.5% beers. I don't want to get to be an ABV Nazi, but the fact is, if most world beers, if average beers home in around 5%...that makes "session beers" no big deal, and once again stuffs 3.5% beers down into the "not enough" category we've seen expanding in beer judging, and in the pale ale, IPA, and even double IPA categories, a real "go big or go home" mentality that I've pegged as the "get a bigger monkey" syndrome. Keep "session beer" defined as 4.5% and less -- or 4% or less -- and you'll get a more level playing field for these beers, and you will see more creativity and more flavor at that level. We're seeing it already.
For gravy
An avid reader of the genre she loves and self-proclaimed workaholic, Cheryl does manage to tear herself away from her computer to spend time with the other two loves of her life, her husband and son.
In the letter, the MCC said it would be "appropriate" for the accounting officer to give 18 of "our people" employment in the municipality.
Still attracted to each other
Feeling Fine and Bloggy at The Tousled Apostle. Want to do top 10s and/or book reviews on your blog? Jamie breaks down the good, the bad and the ugly right here for you. I always appreciate her writing and this is no exception.
Denmark also has mandatory military service (includes things like our Peace Corps, etc.) for the fit and able. I bet the “Occupy our Cities” bunch would love this. This why Denmark does not have the civil unrest and fewer prisons than we do. If we had the same rule in America we could have the peace and prosperity we used to enjoy. Here we just pay people not to work to gain their votes so they can use crime to enhance their welfare.
The photo was labeled “Children’s Arts Festival October 1989″. It showed a number of kids doing what appeared to be arts and crafts outside on picnic tables set up in front of the Community Center. It must have been cold because the kids and the few adults in the picture are all wearing heavy coats or sweaters. The Community Center itself is in the background with the large front porch visible behind the kids seated at the picnic tables. On the porch, you can make out two children seated in a porch swing on the left side of the photograph, while the right side of the porch shows a lone female figure, wearing a large pale-blue dress, standing alone, looking out over the kids.
More daffodils along my side border (near the tulip magnolia). they are between the driveway and the house, so perhaps the residual heat of brick and asphalt may help them. At least a cold snap in February will not last as long as one in January -- just a few days, not a week or more. And our ground temperature is probably relatively warm, since we have not had an sustained sub-freezing cold yet this winter.
..'Your mind is like a fertile garden and it will grow and grow and grow whatever is allowed to be planted there. Plant seeds of beautiful truth, endless potential, optimisim, beauty and gratitude.....if you plant those things thickly enough they will choke out all the weeds'...
B: … bliss.
So I open the door fully prepared to map out the quickest way back into town and he’s all, “Hey, ponytail. I hear you’ve got a big birthday coming up. Pack up the funny and break out your best PJs, girl. We’re hitching the big black horse down to Funky Town. I brought the doughnuts, ’cause you know, this is gonna be one long trail ride.”
1 pint of strawberry sherbet
And the yellow half-moon large and low:
Painting: Celeste Bergin, Still life in progress, oil on 18x24 canvas panel
So I made apple crisp. They turned out to be perfect apples for apple crisp. Add a couple scoops of ice cream, and voila!
I will go over this in more depth now and in doing that, it is unavoidable to repeat some things, but my aim in this blog is to help people better understand the forces at play that are really in their command once they understand them. It is in your power ABSOLUTELY to heal yourself, given that you have the knowledge.
Anwaar: (very calmly) Ah, yes. That must be my father and his guards.
to question
Long story short, I ended up with a sunburn and slightly singed hands. Thank you, summertime.
Only time would tell.
‘Johnson says wisely that just as important as knowledge of a subject is knowing where to find out about it. I own many reference tomes, I make jottings in notebooks, and I tear articles out of journals, but on the whole I am a serendipic rather than a systematic collector of information. I trust in fate and it’s remarkable once I have got a topic in my mind how often relevant items will pop up in my reading of newspapers and books, or on the radio and television. If a necessary area remains a blank, I am happy to leave it so till necessity drives me to fill it in through library research, or consultation with experts, or, in matters of geography say, personal visit.
VKT is best eaten with steamed rice and Chinese crullers (You Char Kwai). For extra kick, use bird eye chili in soya sauce as dipping sauce for the VKT.
In the past year my career has reached a point where things started to settle down a bit. Hapa found its groove, I added two amazing chefs to my team, and the food started to really reach people. It seemed like a good time to step back and take stock of where we had been, where we would be going. A time to focus in on everything that had slipped through my fingers during that first difficult year. Instead I wanted things to be hard again. I craved the struggle. The person who started this blog at one point found refuge in cooking. It was a place to find peace. Then somewhere along the way the stress fractures started to give way and a volatile mix of worry, self doubt, and anger...and for fucks sake it felt glorious. There was no more potent cocktail that could make my adrenaline flow and force me to focus in.
On Wednesday, Leap Day, my nephew and his wife welcomed a beautiful baby boy!!!! Awesome as this is my brother's son. If you have been here much then you know my brother passed away 4 years ago. I am super excited to be a Great Aunt!!
Despite all the hype surrounding them, Into The Top Corner looks at those 10 most linked players in the Premier League who might actually stay at the same club where they are at the start of the next season.
As the students progress with this strategy then I start choosing primary sources or documents that the students are less familiar with and have some missing pieces of information such as the author or even the title of the document. By taking some parts away from the document it forces the students to go throw the five steps in the information fluency outline such as what is the document or source, who is the author or authors, and what is the time period in which it was created. I do allow the students to use many different types of resources to look up valid information and make the decision concerning its creditability especially if the information is coming from an internet resource. I strongly encourage students to focus on the notes they have from class lectures and discussions to stress to them that not all of their answers are necessarily on the internet.
It’s like this: you cack some sphere-jockey in Hubspace, or you sell Bluetab to the chemjunkies on Arcturus, or you bop with some Biggie’s girl and he throws SPIT-NET a bone, and you find yourself lookin’ up the nostrils of a Judge as he looks down. Prison, he says, or worse. But you’re a slammer, still running green on all your lights—young, strong, not a total dumbass—so your law-squawk cuts you a deal. Prison or a CFC. For you jump-chumps sqattin’ on the john and scanning this down, that means Corporate Frontier Contract, affirm? A one-way ticket to the ass-end of nowhere, the Big Empty, hupping for snot-pay through more shit-top ugly duty than’ll reg on a heavy scanner. Rads, rock-watches, pirates, the rest of it. Crazy.
Well okay then. See you guys on the next post! Mwah! さようなら!
4. “inbred movie”
The public, outraged by this gross abuse of power by the police, turned up today at the police headquarters in Bukit Aman to demand his whereabouts and release. Here’s the story.
A case has been opened and is being investigated," says Lefekane.
In the past three months I’ve also immersed myself in other blogs. The funny, the sad, the mummy, the bad (as in ‘cool’, sorry, it needed to rhyme) – the blogosphere is brimming with talent. Talent I wish I could emulate.
In this Lenten season, I’m focused on gratitude … for something bigger than me, for the healing hands of physicians, and for the people in my life who make any progress possible.
Weakness: Despite their athletes, the Tigers aren’t a great rebounding team. Memphis is barely out-rebounding its opponents on the season. The Tigers are grabbing just 67.1 percent of their opponents’ misses. That’s just not going to cut it in the tournament. This is a product of the team wanting to get out in transition. However, if they play a team that’s strong on the offensive boards it could be an early exit for them.
From setting fire to his bathroom to allegedly stamping on Scott Parker’s head and throwing darts at youth team players to almost breaking Alex Song’s leg, his time in England has been eventful to say the least. But for the great value his antics have provided, we’ve had many of the most entertaining stories about his off-pitch life rubbished by Balotelli as pure fabrication.
And so all I really wanted to say, is that I will not be giving up my day job. I am not cut out to be a bellydancer, or a latin dancer, or any type of dancer for that matter. My favourite is the dance where you look kind of like a monkey, and there is a lot of turning that makes you dizzy.
marriage to singer Bobby
He got rich. Brought the sacristy’s sacred funk
Therefore,i can steal a little bit time to update
As we went through the national park we took a little detour to a little piece of paradise called Wattamolla. I have heard about this place for a long time so I was very happy to visit it. The weather was perfect, we have had such foul weather lately but this weekend the skies dazzled in their freshly washed brightness and we laughed as we tripped down the highways in a little red convertible......
On 14th November last, Bishop Rifan ordained two new Deacons, the Reverend Deacon Renan Menezes and the Reverend Deacon Bruce Júdice, for the Apostolic Administration.
96. Jurassic Park (Jeff Goldblum) – The dinosaurs continue to scare me every time I watch it.
But maybe i’m just cynical. Feel free to add your thoughts to the matter in the comments.
In most rural communities, the visible church is more stable and will likely remain (although many historic mainline churches are closing). Naturally, change in rural communities do not happen as frequently; therefore, people will have the opportunity to integrate their spirituality and their religious life when they feel a need to do so (e.g., some may even decide to enter a church after a long absence after Baptism, Confirmation, wedding/funeral, or the odd Christmas worship service).
I mean, I was too. Pretty much every 12-year-old girl was at the time.
Ooohh, the excitement! We're all a-twitter.
The vibrant and eclectic bill for Guilfest, held in Guildford’s idyllic Stoke Park on July 4th, 5th and 6th 2008 which boasts seven music stages, will continue to grow over the next few weeks, with top performers due to be announced for both the comedy and theatre tents. Further great onsite facilities include the Kidzone, (which helped win GuilFest the ‘Best Family Festival Of The Year’ Award in 2006), a mammoth real ale bar, various funky cocktail bars, a fantastic range of food stalls, let alone a huge variety of stalls selling everything you could ever hope to find at a festival.
But this is a mindless action movie, you can't expect great things from it's story. If you want action, you will get it with this movie. Sometimes it takes a while to get to the cool stuff, and all the in between scenes are to silly and boring for my liking. Not all the stunts were fun, but for the most part, it works well. This is just another one of those action flicks that's enjoyable the first time if you don't feel like using your brain at all. But honestly, it will be forgettable.
Brewed: 08-17-2009
As I mentioned in a recent post, I have become embroiled in a personal situation which, being as frank as possible, involves me doinking the tits off of my boss's wife.
It will be my first time testing out recipes from Lindt. They do look very tempting. =)
5 tablespoons soy sauce
Restrepo et al., 1990 (Colombia): Spontaneous abortion
son issues, graduation issues, job issues.
Ok, and let’s look forward to our May goals -
I’ve added an solid state drive, but that’s another option. Without the SSD and monitor I come in at less than $700 for the whole setup. With the two options, I come to around $1000.
This is indeed what makes Britain a special case – as in a special Basket Case – among the EU’s larger players: the French have their farming to fall back on, and the Germans their engineering. We have a bunch of lunatics buying and selling worthless shreds of paper. So while the EU lacks the money for economic ignition, the UK lacks a motor as well as the money. One shouldn’t ridicule the Sarkozy jibe just because it came from an intellectual Anglophobic ant: technically, he’s right. Only 13% of the UK economy does something other than provide retail or financial services.
And because I am writing this on a Tuesday I am linking up with Jess form Diary of a SAHM for I Blog on Tuesdays! Thanks Jess, it's good to be back.
If this vexed question threatens to ruin your Valentine’s evening… as in “will I / shall I… etc” (or even… “should I?”) … The BBC, as ever, comes to your aid: here
***1/2
Her company has also came out to confirm that that is not her twitter account. And it would not be right of her to post such a tweet since she is endorsing for Samsung.
the assured magazine inclusion did not happen – I don’t know why but can only assume that Olympic/Jubilee preparations overtook it -
Computers can be analyzed. Otherwise, I could take your computer, fire it up and analyze everything about it. I could see the processor speed, the different connections and how much memory was available. A few minutes of examination would reveal everything about your computer.
Gently roll falafel by hand, place on slotted large spoon and gently lower into oil. Falafel should quickly rise to the surface. You might need to reduce the heat if the falafel fritters get dark too quickly and do not cook inside. Cook for a few minutes and drain on a paper towel.
Have a really great night and thanks so much for stopping by. :)
So this past week, I've been a bit bummed because I've had to take a short break from running because I overdid things and ended up with a foot injury (hence no training recap this week either, since there was no running going on!). Good news...it's not a stress fracture, which I feared. Yay! Bad news...I had to miss the Times Colonist 10K race this past weekend. I have to admit, I was dying to race and was pretty upset I had to miss it, but my foot only started to feel better on Saturday and the race was Sunday. Oh le sigh. Hubs still ran the race, so we headed down to a sea of over 12,000 people who were running or walking the race. Admittedly I was bummed...OK, fine...I was mad at the world, but I decided that instead of being grumpy, I was going to take this opportunity to watch the race as a spectator.
Well, then came bible study. That didn't go well. My first time with this group and I felt (and still do) feel like a fish out of water. I just don't fit in I don't think. I'm assured by all including Dutch that it'll be fine. It just takes time. Ok, for someone with trust and anxiety issues, yeh, it takes time. Try an eternity! Anyway, I got really upset. He was awake when I went to bed and knew something was up. So he asked and I told him. He said he thinks it'll be fine. Kept asking me if I wanted him to be like other HoHs out there. I said no, I want us to be us. (what can I say, I'm a tool, a brat)
Good news that it is obviously great to see an online property as awesome as Revision3 get the mainstream attention it deserves. Revision3 is an innovator both in content as well as technology, recently having migrated its content over to HTML5
Springfest was only the beginning of the festivities. The week before commencement, Brandeis holds a Senior Week for everyone graduating. It’s like a fun version of orientation in reverse + alcohol. Basically, they’ve planned parties, socials, boat trips, casino trips, and tons of other random activities to promote nostalgia. We even have the option of spending the night in our freshman dorm rooms and having brunch with our halls.
And at night he would love,
He’s afraid
Perhaps most crucially for us, she points out, ‘the interesting thing about the representation on pews seems to be that they are on shields, like heraldic devices. The reason for this could be interesting to think about. What does it mean for those bodily fragments to be positioned as signs of personal identity, origin, and genealogical purpose? This motif makes me think of all the past hands and feet brushing or shuffling past them over the ages. These carvings might have often been touched in passing before they were seen or looked at attentively. Did the designers and artisans have this bodily proximity in mind when they chose a motif which emphasises the body? Touching the “hands” of Christ would have been unavoidable, and could have been an unconscious or semiconscious act of piety, as the seat became more and more familiar to its occupants during the course of their lifetimes.’
Aug 28 The Woodlands, TX (Review by ROBot Girl/LPU)
But first, the stuff:Once I figured out these shoes (which I also LOVE, last wore in April, but first got in June 2008), they really tied everything together. Because really, the oldest things I have in my wardrobe are actually accessories, specifically, my Grandma J's pieces that she gave me. My copper set, above, are from the mid-50s, by Renoir.
-”I thought she’s your essence.”
1378 ***D-IV/6(A)/2001. “On Representing Oneself.” The School of Law, The University of South Dakota, Vermillion, South Dakota. (Incorporated in Item B-15 (Projected), above, pp. 423-31(2004).)
Also listen to "Tascott - You Must Think I'm Santa Claus 1906 FINAL (fixed)" and you will notice that there is still noise, but now you can tell what the music sounds like even so. In the original file, the noise was so bad that it hurt my ears to listen to it more than once. I think you will agree that the corrected file sounds much nicer and you could stand to listen to it over and over.
1/2 cup butter, softened
I finished reading Jeff Jarvis's Public Parts on a plane a few days ago. He raises some interesting questions about the transformative nature of publicness. He also connects the "personal" public with the "shared" public - his own decisions about sharing information with changing community expectations about what information and resources are shared. I think this is important.
1 tin tomatoes
Or watch the things you gave your life to, broken,
MJ has a lovely engagement ring (which I also failed to photograph) and seems really, really happy. (In fact, I had commented on her happiness before she showed me the ring.) They are only barely thinking about wedding planning at this point. MJ says it will probably not take place for a couple of years.
First, during our Summer holiday, I was a bit unlucky. Whilst a Hilarious day out, me and my DD fell. She fell on my foot, which got hurt very bad.
When I got home I received a phone call from S. Cressotti telling me that Irving Cohn was rushed to the hospital today with a heart attack but is expected to recover. I then called the Church of the Epiphany on Highland Avenue in Wilbraham and left a message for Father Campbell telling him about people being let in early at their tag sale. I explained to him how unfair and unethical that was and informed Campbell that if he hasn't instilled basic ethics in his people then he has failed as a cleric. The trouble with Christianity is that it makes forgiveness too easy; you can blow off your sins and just walk away.
I'm also playing a a male moogle in a fanmade series for Final Fantasy, lol I can sound like a boy but no its not worrying I can make my voice low and deep.
Jasper Johns
"The curse is come upon me," cried
HOMG, they never learn(ed)
Perhaps this is how I'll console myself for missing Wurstfest this year.
The civil rights group’s reversal came after Sherrod said her comments had been taken out of context and the farmer’s wife came to her defense. Elouise Spooner said Sherrod had helped save her family farm and is “a friend for life.”
It is early in the evening, and I'm dancing with a fellow I sometimes have trouble with. For one, I don't always feel like I can follow his steps smoothly, but as though I'm almost falling, or coming down too hard on forward and side steps with him. And let's not get into my opinion of his wild dancefloor experimentation with other partners.
My cue to have a break! She used to do this a couple of years ago and I presume it’s another “coping strategy”. I guess she’s so used to me constantly being interactive with her, that this wasn’t the norm. Note to self, do paperwork when she’s at school!
Yes, he was abusive to me. Yes, it was a huge leap of faith to leave my children with their father after all the things he did to me and after trying so hard in custody court to keep him from taking them from me. Yes, I have wondered if leaving was the right choice. But you know what? Even though I still rarely communicate directly with him (he had me served with lawsuit papers last year on the day before I went in for cancer surgery; I am still angry about that) I hear anecdote after anecdote from my children that he is stepping up and making good choices for the family. He supports our son’s desire to study abroad next year. He made arrangements for our daughter to have female support through Big Brothers/Big Sisters. He attends Down syndrome support groups. No, he doesn’t parent the way I did, but I believe he loves our children. If I thought he didn’t, deep down in my heart, I never would have left. No matter what.
But best of all, the Good Shepherd is with us, One who has been through every dark valley. He’s been there, and done that! He is a man of sorrows, well acquainted with our grief. He knows the way through the valley. He promises not to leave us there but to guide us THROUGH it.
2011: .250/.313/.500 with 7 homers
What can I say? It's seeing your life on hold, while you watch everyone's flying by. It's wanting something so precious, but increasingly elusive. It's wanting to hold a baby in your arms. Not someone else's baby, but your baby.
- GYM.
The other night was a little different – the case she opened with began last Saturday morning in Tucson, Arizona – an adorable 6-year old girl went missing sometime through the night.
He is also the only blogger of my acquaintance to note the passing at 83 of the man who invented hard rock-- in 1958!-- Link Wray, the man whose "Rumble" was the only instrumental ever banned on AM radio.
these tides reverse,
Given this failure, what will the legislature do? If the goal is to improve energy efficiency and put funding where it will make the best impact on the environment, the legislature will remove these failed regulations. If, however, adopting "green" building legislation is primarily about cultivating a "green" political image, little will be done because changing the rules will risk the political benefits candidates received by supporting the legislation. Time will tell which is more important to legislators.
I swear before the grand opening of the new bowling alley, Spins, near my town, I hadn't been in one for a very long time. Years ago, we hosted my daughter's birthday party at an old place in Connecticut. I stuck to serving the pizza that day. Other than her birthday, my memories of bowling involved lying on a couch in my apartment at college, watching it on television when the only other option was a show called, Big Bass Fishing. I have a vague recollection of switching back and forth between the channels. I'm pretty sure I liked the fishing show better back then. Obviously, that was before we finally ordered cable. After a late night, I don't think we really cared what was on the screen anyway. Funny how times change.
Isn't this so fun!? Now someone please have a baby girl so we can make all this prettiness happen!
Sounds nobler there than ’neath the sun;
So, use that advice for good and evil, and when you do become Great Leader of the New World Order, please do cite this post, or at least don’t hunt down and terminate its author.
I just love when impulse purchases are actually really awesome. You know, something that you don't smack yourself in the forehead after the fact, and exasperatedly place the useless item into the garbage bin. I bought a Nintendo 3DS about a month and a half ago because I saw that it was $50 off at the electronic store. There was no way I was passing that deal up. So I got a red one with The Legend of Zelda: Ocarina of Time 3D for about $160.
Poppy King, the Lipstick Queen, is sharing her talent and knowledge in several collaborations this year. She has created a signature lipstick for J. Crew, a range of seven lipsticks for the Boots no. 7 makeup line (soon available in the U.S.!), and a set of four lippies for the design house Kate Spade.
This man has given me the greatest blessings of my life, our three children, allowing me to fulfill my greatest dream of becoming a mother.
People around me would consider me lucky for lots of reasons, in the same way that people always think that other people are better off. And i guess in some ways I am lucky (no ties, no commitments etc) but i just feel really fucking lonely all of the time. Most of my friends are settled down and the ones that aren’t live far away or are as fucked up as I am. I constantly compare myself to other and come off worst.
Needless to say, the staff of the House Financial Services Committee, a group to which I belong, was more than a little busy. I am a perfectionist who prides myself in turning out very precise, well-crafted legal work, and although I wound up doing what I think was a respectable job during the conference, I literally had multiple panic attacks in the course of so doing. And I am someone who previously doubted the existence of panic attacks, so I don't make that claim lightly. Once the conference concluded, I had nightmares for a month about mistakes that I might have made. They started out eerily real -- some of them were barely distinguishable from reality, so much so that I would consult the final conference report first thing the next morning to make sure that I hadn't made the dreamed-about mistake -- and then got more and more outlandish as I started to let the stress of the conference slip away.
I was in my office working when Mrs. Z called me and told me I needed to come home to take him to the vet. She’d found him hiding under the desk in my study. He’d gotten sick. We knew the time had come for him. Schpup hasn’t been himself for a few weeks now. He was moving slower. He wasn’t running. His appetite was diminished and he’d developed a bad limp. There were times when he seemed confused.
It's an absolutely deliciously beautiful Sunday in the mid-South. Kyan, Karis, and I have already done a three mile walk (and I realized when we got back that one of the crossbars on the bottom of my double stroller is broken. Wahhh! Kyan is almost four and is probably too old for a double stroller but as long as he would sit in this one then his butt was going to be in it. But now it's falling apart and I'm thinking, since my "babies" are nearly two and four that purchasing another one wouldn't be the best financial decision. Boo). I'm thinking we're going to spend the remainder of the day soaking up the Sunday Sunshine. And there will probably be ice cream involved as well . . .
This idea isn't mine, but a fabulous idea I adapted from one of my co-workers. It worked so well last year.
We have small eggs at the moment - all our laying girls are new layers, so I used six small eggs. If you have large eggs, use four. Add salt and pepper, about ½ cup of cream, ½ cup of grated hard cheese - I used cheddar, and all the ricotta. Mix together then add the silverbeet and onions and mix again.
“You say you keep worrying about someone! It’s what happens when you have someone you like!”
Two million years ago, an eruption of the supervolcano darkened the skies with ash from southern California to the Mississippi River, releasing more than 500 cubic miles of ash into the sky.
- dizziness
Gelatin/Gel – Protein obtained by boiling skin, tendons, ligaments, and/or bones with water. From cows and pigs. Used in shampoos, face masks, and other cosmetics. Used as a thickener for fruit gelatins and puddings (e.g., “Jello”). In candies, marshmallows, cakes, ice cream, yogurts. On photographic film and in vitamins as a coating and as capsules. Sometimes used to assist in “clearing” wines. Alternatives: carrageen (carrageenan, Irish moss), seaweeds (algin, agar-agar, kelp—used in jellies, plastics, medicine), pectin from fruits, dextrins, locust bean gum, cotton gum, silica gel. Marshmallows were originally made from the root of the marsh mallow plant. Vegetarian capsules are now available from several companies. Digital cameras don’t use film.
I love my sister dearly, which is why I take such excellent care of her. She’d never doubt for a moment my conviction to her happiness, and I know in my heart that she appreciates my sacrifice. Someday, when she’s feeling grateful – so grateful that nothing in the whole world could upset her – I’ll admit that I’ve been poisoning her the whole time.
But make no mistake: the transition is underway.
It’s an HDR from the usual three frames each with 2 stops difference. I purposely didn’t eliminate the ghosting artifact from his movements; I thought it enriched the picture. But your points may vary… so why don’t you let me know? I’m sure I can learn something from your comments. B-)
Well just when I thought I had no show and tell.... I remembered you might like to see my buns, oh hush now you know I am teasing!! :-)
Any EBW member may create one new beadweaving of your own design (not from a tutorial, kit, book, magazine, or class) in response to the challenge theme. Your work should be entirely beadwoven, or have a substantially woven component, to feature and promote our art form. You may not renew an existing piece, or list a tutorial or made-to-order item as an entry.
5. Iron Man 2
You can take our homes, but you'll never take our sense of humour
Which consists of Qualcomm APQ8060 2 GHz combined core processor, and 1GB DDR2 Ram memory, this tablet performs multiple tasks at once. Watching your favorite High-definition movie, downloading it your favorite movies and tunes, and web browsing at a remarkable speed hasn’t been so simple.
That's a substantial lead, but it's probably not TV money and not enough to make the race a slam dunk. If you want John Bradley ousted as District Attorney, you might consider helping Ms. Duty add to that lead. Or, obviously, if you'd prefer to see Williamson County voters return Mr. Bradley to power, donate to his campaign (though honestly I couldn't tell you how even after closely examining his website). This is the homestretch and this final month of campaigning - more than all that's gone on before - will determine the outcome of this extraordinary race.
I love the range of experts consulted: nutritionists, stylists, film directors, chefs, personal trainers, rabbis, yogis, Hollywood bimbettes.
Can you spell barracuda? Frankly, I wasn’t interested in how respectful those fish might be of me, or I of them. Last I knew, that statement could only be supposition on the humans’ part. I was perfectly content with, as I said previously, meandering along the seawall, marveling at the beauty of the undersea world, coral and all, while standing firmly on terra cotta.
these were pay beaches and had all these cute little changing rooms behind the umbrella lined beaches.
Whatever it is we’re afraid of, one thing holds true… that, by the time the pain of not doing a thing, gets worse than the fear of doing it, it can feel like we’re carrying around a giant tumor.
“None of those names mentioned in the reports have been produced before the courts. There was so much and I would like to know if it has been read them yet,” Ong added.
Slash: A romantic relationship between two same sex characters.
Tell me, what are your thoughts on being?
I hope you all have a wonderful weekend!
At this point, your rice should be done. Chop up some green onions or scallions and mix into the rice. It adds a nice flavor profile. Serve 5 meatballs over a cup of rice (10 points) topped with the pan sauce and your green beans on the side. Enjoy!
Can you see where this is headed?
Man, I need me some furniture.
Commercial publishers achieve their high sales levels by ensuring that they have a good stock of books and an efficient distribution system which will get their titles from warehouse to bookshop shelves as quickly and as cheaply as possible.
It became something of a game my friends would play with me. Who could come up with the most suggestive answer? Who would be stumped? Who couldn't keep up?
The Guy was wonderfully supportive, as usual. We sat on the grass for a while and he made me drink water. He wanted me to eat, but I was afraid I'd just puke it back up. After we got in the car and started driving home, I got even worse. I was super hot and my vision was all wonky and I realized that I was passing out. I crawled in the back of The Guys car and fainted back there. I came to at some point and kept drinking water and took a shower and then a nap and then drank more.
He did help put the cake papers in and told me which needed “blob”.
It’s the idea that, the more eyeballs, the smaller and more dynamic the groups developing and co-developing the site, the easier it is to debug. The Loop is constantly improving their service, and are collecting information from the sites visitors “at several different points” (The Loop, 2012).
The $2.6 million project would also see demolition of a cluster of two other unused buildings at the St. Paul Street site, according to a report from WHEC-TV.
Actually, that fact illustrates part of the great customer service provided by Easy Canvas Prints. After I uploaded the photo, and went through the various options for finishing - canvas size, canvas thickness, border choice, color oprtions - and placed my creation in the cart, Megan (who, incidentally, was fantastic to work with!) emailed me to let me know the photo might not work out well once it was enlarged for the canvas because it was out of focus. Megan informed me that their art departement carefully reviews every order before processing to make sure they can produce a quality product. If there's any question about the quality of the photo you've uploaded, someone from their art department will email you with their concerns.
This doesn't mean this blog will close down just that we will not be doing any more posts here.
 Easier access to more and more traditionally White jobs.
For a television network, an audience gain or loss of one percentage point in the Nielsen ratings translates into a change in advertising revenue of from $80 to $100 million a year, with some variation depending on measures of audience “quality.” The stakes in audience size and affluence are thus extremely large, and in a market system there is a strong tendency for such considerations to affect policy profoundly. This is partly a matter of institutional pressures to focus on the bottom line, partly a matter of the continuous interaction of the media organization with patrons who supply the revenue dollars. As Grant Tinker, then head of NBC-TV, observed, television “is an advertising supported medium, and to the extent that support falls out, programming will change.”
“From this point forward, as humanity comes into its new self-knowing, the desires of the world will be unity. However long it takes to heal the past—all past—however long it takes to join hearts and minds and purposes, this is a new era.
Former NFL star found dead of self-inflicted gun shot wound. Reading that headline once was odd. Reading that a second time was saddening. Now, with today’s news of the apparent suicide of former NFL star and certain Hall of Famer Junior Seau, I just get chills. Seau’s death comes just weeks after former Atlanta Falcons safety Ray Easterling took his own life and months after the suicide of Chicago Bears stalwart Dave Duerson. Sadly this has been a growing trend. According to the website Gamesover.org, which is dedicated to helping players make the transition to life after football, the suicide rate for NFL players is six times the national average.
I received a fedora as a birthday gift back in 2008. I wasn’t quite sure what to do with it as I hadn’t worn a hat in decades. My friend said, “It screamed your name.” I thought, “It probably screamed, ‘DON’T GIVE ME TO DEZRA.’” But I graciously (I hope) accepted the fedora and wore it on that hot August day for the rest of the day. As the months passed and I kept looking at it, I asked myself, “Why did my friend think this hat was ME?” I was totally flummoxed. I felt totally awkward even having it in the house.
Label: Mercury
The other two thirds of Clerks 2 is as good as a three day old sweaty ass seat. So often accident is the agency of enlightenment, in this case, it is the agency of crap.
The Adventures of Tintin: The Secret of the Unicorn
etc....
While Whitt did a lot of rolling and scooting. If you know my Whitt, then it should come as no surprise that he would not stay on this massive pallet. I know I stopped and put him back on it at least 50 times! Even with toys to play with, he just wanted to scoot off and eat grass and dirt.
But with a little bit of specialised adjusting, it might be fixable!
Up next: Perhaps a search for Woody, the Deschutes traveling beer wagon, rumored to be in the Phoenix area in honor of Spring Training baseball!! Yeah.
The vast area of ocean covered by the oil spill approaches 4000 square miles, the size of Delaware and Rhode Island combined.[1] In combination, the crude oil from the well plus the toxic chemical dispersants used by BP now pose a major public health danger to the coastal populations of the Gulf – as with Hurricane Katrina. At the same time, oil from the BP spill has begun to enter the ocean currents of the Gulf Stream. This could carry dangerous pollutants along the coast of Florida and the East Coast towards Europe and the rest of the world – where the toxic plumes could destroy entire fish populations around the globe. Hurricane season has already started, and severe storms pose a threat of even greater dispersal of the toxins and carcinogens now floating in the Gulf in vast quantities.
We already know the long term suspects, Emmanuel Frimpong and the Verminator.
If you don't have a tailor's ham insert another pair of socks or a small pillow.
:: I have mixed feeling about Craig Thompson's latest work, Habibi. I honestly don't know what to make of it. This long, sprawling tale follows two youths in a fictional Arabic land, a young woman and a boy, whose grim turns in life bring them together. They run away into the desert and make a home, of sorts, in an abandoned boat, where the woman cares for the boy, who slowly grows up and starts to notice things about the woman he lives with.
state out of Benue for the
Whatever the reason may be for avoidance, there’s going to be a day of reconciliation, that you’ll eventually have to face this issue. The more we can face our problems and issues, the faster forgiveness may come. Nothing is unforgivable, whatever the circumstance may be. God is waiting for you, if you haven’t sought Him out yet. He died on the cross for us, so we can be forgiven. There’s no such thing as unforgiveness in His eyes. I ask Him forgiveness for my past actions all the time. I’ve come to accept my mistakes I’ve made in the past. Reminisce with friends and family of previous behavior, don’t dwell, and to ask forgiveness from the Lord is the only thing you can do, He will take care of the rest.
PLAAKKK…
I took a little liberty on the sketch. The patterned paper was suppose to be straight but I liked it better tipped. The photo is one I took last year in Sarnia. The sentiment was added using Photoshop Elements 9. The background paper is white with a light blue marble on it but the blue does not show up in the photo. It looked like it needed something so I did a pen stitch around the edge.
sharing his 30+ years of cooking experience
More than anything, it’s a fascinating portrait of a newspaper which isn’t currently embroiled in the all-too-familiar scandals and political point-scoring of UK ones. Any political agenda it has is completely lost on me, not being American or as actively political as I could be. Instead, viewed as a complete outsider, it becomes an interesting look at not just how a newspaper functions in the perceived Age Of Free, but what drives the people who keep the wheels – and the presses – running.
Description: Do you want to make kids laugh? Children’s author, Nancy I. Sanders, will use popular published examples of funny kids’ favorites to show you how to help your manuscript tickle those funny bones. From crafting scenes with a laughter-inducing punch to writing silly slapstick, join in this teleclass and learn techniques you can implement in picture books as well as novels to make young readers chuckle and laugh out loud.
Myself & Andy are are looking forward to this event at what is widely regarded as one of the most exciting up & coming craft beer houses in the North, the licensee Mick has worked extremely hard on bringing in the best beers from around the world lately & is putting his legendary outlet at the top of the tree in the Northeast & we are both excited & humbled to be a part of it.
3. We send them samples and a media kit.
Of course the proliferation of flavors is also something that makes the small breweries stand out and outstanding. Many beer drinkers await the seasonal beers produced by the small breweries with as much enthusiasm as basketball fans have for the annual March Madness.
Then I plug them into YouTube and find this super adorable music video for Stackhat:
I am trying to wrap my head around parenting a child who is showing more & more autism signs. Keep her sensory needs met, especially when she refuses the treatment, which is virtually impossible unless I just let her run & chase after her… which works here at home, but not so much in church in heels & with people watching. UHG
Peace doesn't die
11/03 Arlington, VA @ Galaxy Hut
Barked Shag as he began to chase his own tale in tiny little circles.
Many PR professionals plan and organize meetings and events for companies or private clients. This larger task involves many smaller duties such as making calls, sending e-mails, signing contracts, etc. for the event. These PR professionals also create and maintain different programs used to develop the image of the client to the public. These types of PR professionals usually work with clients from business, organizations, hospitals, etc. The main responsibility of PR professionals is to be a speaker and representative for their client. In order to do this they write and draft press releases, plan and create press conferences, and ensure that the image portrayed to the public is what the client desires.
Olive oil or Vegetable oil, 1 tablespoon
After they'd exchanged conversation about Alan the local stray cat (who was busy hitching a lift in the wheelbarrow), John was more than happy to supply some fresh blooms for the family table.
SN – Texas Instrument, 74 -TL Series, HC- High speed CMOS, 04 – part number
At first, I thought I was suffering from an onset of the Winter Doldrums or a slight depression. I didn't want to knit, period. I was sick of looking at yarn and the idea of sitting down and working on a project annoyed me. Sewing started to look more inviting, so I dusted off the ol' machine and found a quilt pattern that spoke to me. I finished 2/3 of the first block and it has now sat on top of my machine for almost a month. Marking off Saturday as a dedicated "Day of Sewing" hasn't seen me spending any time whatsoever in pursuit of the craft.
each summer the last summer.
Visting the site (at time of writing) currently provides no answer either, but there are more puzzles involving moving matchsticks, joining dots with the fewest number of straight lines and working out next symbols in series. Maybe the answer will be revealed later today, or in the following weeks. Although I'm sure tons of you will know the answer anyway.
Listening to the debate about motherhood in the last few days reminded me of something that’s been nagging me for a while: what does it mean that mothers are becoming moms?
Of course, I remember.
The spiritually Perfected Ones thus contended in Sloka 4 the following contention:
Doctor Who
To assemble the pizza, transfer a dough ball to a well floured work surface. Flatten into an 8-inch disk, leaving a slightly thicker edge around the rim. Using your hands, gently stretch the dough to a 12-inch circle. (We used a rolling pin, per Annie's suggestion, to get the crust thin enough.) Transfer the dough to a well floured pizza peel and stretch to a 13-inch circle. (We don't have a pizza peel, nor do I know what one is, so I left Marcus in charge of stretching the pizza out as best as he could!) Lightly brush the thicker edge of the disk with olive oil. Spread ½ cup of the pizza sauce over the dough. Sprinkle evenly with the grated Parmesan and the shredded mozzarella. Carefully transfer the pizza to the preheated baking stone. Bake until the cheese is bubbling and slightly browned, 10-12 minutes. Let cool about 5 minutes before slicing and serving.
Anyway, I aim to be back by Monday and hope to spend some time in the next couple of days or so catching up with those of you who I have neglected somewhat.
“Unemployment rising, one million young people out of work and living standards squeezed for all but a few at the top. Irresponsibility is still being rewarded in huge pay rises and bank bonuses and there are problems that go beyond one government.
I'm having a little trouble with Blogger right now and have lost some comments. I get notifications of comments through my Android and sometimes I have difficulty with the touchscreen when I try to approve a comment. Jo, I accidentally deleted your last comment so I must apologize to you. From now on I will just wait until I am online to approve the comments. The screen on my phone is just so small that I can't always get the right link. I'm really sorry about that. Anyway, my mother was a stay at home mom and I would rush home from elementary school every day to see Dark Shadows. I don't remember it well. Not details so watching it again makes it seem all new. We are up to the part where Barnabas Collins has called Maggie Evans to the old house
A Latin couch? Really?
My mom is recovering slowly but surely, which is frustrating for her but truly amazing from a medical standpoint. She's even likely to go back to work in the next few weeks! Her scar is healing nicely, and they did a pretty good job sparing as much hair as possible.
I have been unwell with an unknown (as of now) cause.
Yet I noticed something else; Jesus said to “take my yoke” upon you. Not our own yoke?
We carry burdens that do not need to be our own. We carry with us everything – fear, disappointment, anger, mistrust, hate – both directed at ourselves and others – when God has said we don’t have to. He’s made us the offer to trade our heavy load for His light one. Matthew 11:29-30 say “Take My yoke upon you and learn from Me, for I am gentle and humble in heart, and you will find rest for your souls. For My yoke is easy and My burden is light.”
John Bevere once wrote, “If you desire the praise of man, you will fear man. If you fear man, you will serve him–for you will serve what you fear.”
The Making Mends exhibit might have been the only exhibit that Fox and I agreed on. It was absolutely breath taking. This was another invitational and every last piece was stunning. By far my favourite was a huge display of “Combat Paper”, paper made by shredding a U.S. military uniform, beating it to a pulp, drying it into paper-like consistency, and printing or painting significant messages or images on it. I’m actually not anti military, but messages of peace from the mouth of a soldier means a lot more to me than from anyone else. If only for this exhibit alone, I urge you to make visiting BAM a top priority before this exhibit moves on May 27th.
Here’s the pattern for women (with no controls):
Morning all April challenge is now running over at the Naughty Step Challenge so please pop along and have a look there is a Prize for the winner the link is on my sidebar.
and then he asked me
The silver screen is known to bring out the imagination of people. However, China's film industry has not given birth to a poster child of creativity, eyeing laboriously to any movie that has some measure of success, Chinese or foreign, and subsequently clone the film poster designs.
I know it’s a drop in the bucket, but there are others ready to stand with me, ready to pledge not only their moral support, but their financial support as well.
I was also raised in a single parent home by a devout mother, she lost both of her parents to cancer at a young age.
staying inside and watching the rain from the balcony
You know, that sort of thing?
Even the steps on this pyramid creates a smile within my heart. They knew, the Mayans knew we would really start to understand what they left behind for us in these times. Each face/direction of the pyramid has 91 steps (completions which always house new beginnings) and when you count up all 4 sides, the steps equal 365 steps or days. This is interesting because they didn’t use our current calendar to keep time… yet… this pyramid reflects our current era calendar directly to us. They knew!!!
The more I thought about that, the more I wondered why anyone would want to venture overseas for vacation. So I pulled out my old college atlas and began looking around the globe trying to see if there was any place foreign to America that would interest me during these times.
Cons: A whole new year means a lot of me trying to remember what year it is. It’s hard to remember since it keeps changing.
and you stumble,
Cirque du Freak members
One of the causes of the breakdown of presidential systems is the opposition between legislature and executive: both the president and the majority in the legislature have democratic legitimacy since they are both directly elected. That’s not a problem when both are of the same political family, but when they are not, it’s a recipe for stalemate at best and breakdown at worst.
One Day is a fine example of both my fear of poor accents and my disappointment in a good novel’s bad adaptation. Anne Hathaway’s accent was all over the place; there were times when she sounded as proper as the queen and then she suddenly slipped in to match the verbal stylings of drunk extras on Coronation street. Dear god woman. My hat off to Renée Zellwegger for getting Bridget Jones so startlingly right.
Craig moaned again and this time the echoing moans of the zombies in the tunnels behind them seemed to answer.
his square-jawed face. His eyes were deep blue, and vibrant under his thick ink-black
In addition, set small, round containers (like yogurt containers) on each table with a strip of white paper (12" x 6") and a pencil.
You can now join the two parts together in the middle, using strong glue, and set aside to dry.
Today you think, 'if I don’t understand it, it must be art.' The idea of confronting the object, or what it means is just too hard. There are so many people in the art world that know abso-fucking-lutely nothing. Such Hickey-isms were peppered throughout the talk.
Stamps: Papertrey Ink - Background Basics: Diamonds, Mat Stack 2 Collection, Signature Greetings
icon of darkness, reversal of flesh,
The rest of the afternoon consisted of many turns about the beautiful grounds, exploring the stairways and indulging in long awaited for conversations. Miss Bosworth and I found ourselves in the most peculiar situations more than once; at one point we climbed, very ill advisedly, atop a little stone bridge to see if the view was any more attractive from there. We found that is most certainly was not, and that we most certainly were stuck. Mr. McCarty was summoned to aide Miss Bosworth down and since the Doctor felt (I can only suppose) that I was HIS responsibility, came to aide me. He very politely lifted me off of the bridge and looked at me with only a mild disapproving look, though somewhere in it I was positive I sensed a smile.
Srila Prabhupada, you have already foreseen all these shams and have written about them. You have pointed out that these ‘humble gurus’ are also sahajiyas.
A shrine to Saint Archangel Michael with a print of my Archangel Michael painting in a golden frame, filled with faux pearls
If you’re writing a cheque, please write it in the name of The Redeemed Christian Church of God and then at the back, put ‘Covenant Partner’. Don’t write the cheque in my name.
"Your readers have seen the sky with one moon in it any number of times, right? But I doubt they've seen a sky with two moons in it side by side. When you introduce things that most readers have never seen before into a piece of fiction, you have to describe them with as much precision and in as much detail as possible."
Roasted Peanuts (for Garnish)
Paper: Whisper White, Basic Gray
Best pack: Let's go with the one with the ridiculous Shipley card, shall we?
I’m younger than that now
Of course, players can counter the paintball marker upgrades by loading up a training program that will enforce safety circumstances. Particularly seeing that a bazooka will own. Unfortunately paintball bazookas are simply too impractical, and will have resources for compressed air or CO2 needed to fire your paintball stash. Paintballs must be taken into consideration while purchasing a quality mask. It's important that all paintball guns you may want to keep playing. If there are so many to choose paintball guns provide far more than once a week. Twice is better, but 3+ times a week is optimal. If you plan on storing your paintballs in the paintball marker upgrades, exactly military camouflage style. Combatants wear camouflage as well. This way every position is covered in case someone can't make it, gets hurt or sidelined.
Life is difficult sometimes. There are hard times and painful experiences that can leave us confused and bewildered. Many times we find ourselves struggling to comprehend and cope with what is taking place in this merry-go-round we call life. Even in the midst of enduring and coping during hardship and pain, we can open doors to ministers to others who are in need, sharing the love of God. I have heard many people say “Why did God do this to me”, or cry out, “God, this isn’t fair”. As we endure painful experiences there are no easy answers. Many times life does not seem fair. In the middle of heartache that life brings our way we can put our trust in Him, and discover wondrous opportunities to share the love of Christ with others. The world around us will watch how we, as believers endure our hardships, and our lives can become living testaments to our faith. Watching friends, co-workers and family members go through painful situations will offer up opportunities to interact with them in support, opening the door for the love of Christ to be shared.
0520-0600 - Everybody Was In The French Resistance... Now!
French, Spanish, German and African foods and preperations have combined to give us the Cajun and Creole foods we enjoy today.
April 30, 2011 5:49 PM
Success comes to those that are willing to leave their “comfort zones” and reach out to do more!
The major epicenter of this type of sanctioned aerosol art is the block-long, 200,000-square-foot (19,000 m2) factory building complex in Long Island City, Queens, known as 5 Pointz (includes a link to the photo gallery).
Anyway. It's been a funny week! Not funny ha ha, funny funny. Funny different. Like the way my gynecologist once told me I have a funny uterus. Ha ha ha ha. Oh, this is off to a good start.
He said the investigations by the Royal Commission were necessary to ensure there was no repeat of such incidents and the steps being taken mirrored the Government’s commitment to finding out the cause of death so that Teoh’s family and the public can know what really happened.
Shredded mozzarella cheese, optional
Obligatory: Always, unless you have properly thanked the individual in person.
I think we all need some down time once and awhile, don't you? And...if you happen to be visiting San Francisco in the near future, be sure and visit the Nob Hill Spa. It's fabu!
And I was writing in my sleep again . . .
(TL NOTE Turner family fought on both sides in this war)
Ok, it's not 'technically' animate or breathing, but I still feel bad about the neglect. It's like not agriculture a babyish or pet or something. Except I'm appealing abiding the blog will not like... die or whatever.
Why do breweries use clear bottles, then? I understand that the move to package these fine brews in such containers has to do with marketing appeal, meshing (I think) with our Western fetish for "white". White sugar, white flour, white eggs, and beer in clear bottles....they're all of a piece (and they're all bad, except for the white eggs, I guess, which are nutritionally equivalent to their brown counterparts.)
Where do you store all the stuff? All the items are grouped together by price in Tupperware tubs. I got two cheapy $2.99 packs from IKEA, and it was enough for all my stuff. Each of these bins are labeled with prices. On store day all these containers get put out on the table arranged from cheapest to most expensive. On non-store days I keep the bins inside a large five drawer Sterlite container inside my storage closet.
I could see him suffer as he saw my ever-growing unconditional love for you.
He is 3 going on 83 with his “oh I’m afraid I can’t have broccoli mummy, you see my tummy dust can’t be bothered” or “oh dear Deary me, I don’t want that story daddy”. Just priceless. We try so so hard not to laugh as its serious stuff, being 3 but sometimes the quaking with laughter does escape.
She gives me a handout, titled CONTAINMENT. This is not very unlike teaching, all these handouts. It is up to the student to read the handout, of course.
House Made Cherry Jagerwurst, Maple Rosemary White Bean Ragout, and Michigan Cherries Soaked in Coup d etat. Beer Pairing: Coup d’état
When she moved back to Tokyo, she didn’t waste any time getting a job as a restaurant consultant with Suntory. She didn’t have any experience, but she was armed with a natural confidence and the focused determination of a former high-school tennis champ. Suntory put her to work in their restaurants, and during her nearly four years with the company, she learned how to create a restaurant from scratch: everything from developing the concept and menu, to coordinating the interior and finding a chef to match.
Yes, but let's call it a button instead of a blinkie. :) It's a miniature version of the picture at the beginning of this post. I did not make one that blinks. It is a "stand alone" button. You will find it in the sidebar of my blog and below this paragraph. Right-click and save it to your computer to add to your blog. I also ask that you link it back to this post or my blog. Feel free to add it to message board signatures too. I hope you like it.
Boobs - Massive, well larger than before, sore, BOOBS. So sore you contemplate removing them. This could also be a personal thing. As far as I can recall I don’t think having your prized gems smacked around makes your arms swell and hurt. The best part is because they are ripe they become all that more appealing to males. Want another fun test males? Try to touch them when they’re in this fragile state.
The word “church” is not in the original Greek and was maliciously added to obscure the original Greek word “ekklesia” by the King James’ translators. “Ekklesia ” was used among the Greeks as a body of the citizenry GATHERED to discuss the affairs of state. Old King James sought to keep the status quo in the understanding of “church” as a “building” where congregations would come to hear sermons from authorized clergy members, and where the congregants could also take part in “church” sacraments, such as the Lord’s Supper and baptism, also officiated over by officers of, you guessed it, “the church.” In the “church” there was also an “order of service” that was faithfully followed as well which consisted of announcements, opening prayer, singing, offering, congregational reading, sermon, and closing prayer. We haven’t changed that order in centuries. Of course, I don’t know if the King James’ congregations turned around and greeted one another so maybe we can take some credit for adding a notion of Christian fellowship to the order of service, be it ever so small.
I called my Grandmother to find out where else they may have hid the guts. After she gave me some pointers on how to get that turkey more thawed out I was able to find the frozen solid packet of giblets stuck up inside of that bird.
Admittedly, I’ve never seen the 1959 Alain Resnais film that helped spark the French New Wave featuring a French-Japanese couple talking about their memories. But I do know the Ultravox! song, a strangely minor key and emotionally charged New Wave dance song from 1977, a time when the band still had an exclamation point in their name.
Spoon into cake tin and bake for 1 hour. Remove from oven and
Before Pathfinder I would have to say it was Mutants and Masterminds. M&M revitalized a genre and brought it to the forefront of creativity and enthusiasm in a way we hadn't seen in some time. It became the "go-to" system for superheroes. If you wanted to run a super-hero campaign the first thing you checked out was M&M.
You need to do both these things:
Atheists, secular humanists, scientific materialists and liberals cannot comprehend that humans actually have something called free will and can and should be held accountable for their attitudes and actions. They’re wrong and literally destroy their very own arguments in being wrong:
Since their bites can cause the childs scalp to become itchy and inflamed, repeated scratching cause skin irritation and even infection. A extremely effective natural remedy is tea tree oil. You can even see them when you rinse the comb in a sink with water. little gray insects or parasites brown hair that reaches the known as lice. In inclusion, head lice evolved over the ages to turn into resilient to survive the effects and treatments are more and more. Hence, we should consider how to prevent this problem reoccurring in the future.
"I want to stay with William."
But one horrifying night, an old enemy murders Safe’s founder, Atticus, and the community is taken over by an army of shadows. Only Matthew, Ariel, and a handful of friends escape Above. Now they not only have to survive in a sunlit world they barely know, but they must unravel the mystery of the shadows’ fury and Atticus’s death. It’s up to Matthew to find a way to remake Safe—not just for himself and his family, but for Ariel, who’s again faced with the life she fled, and who needs him more than ever before.
What are your best tips and tricks for getting good images for your listings?
i ni dah la suka tengok interestingly generated websites, and this website is really creative and awesome!
You sat down the phone, grabbed your winter coat and headed out into the chilly weather. The cold winds started to nip at your cheeks as you buried your face into your coat so you could keep warm. You finally arrived at his house, with red cheeks from the snowy enviroment outside. He lead you into his house, which was warm and lively. His eyes were red and teary, probably from crying. There were also a few damp tissues scattered across the ground. Alise, Raivis’ cat was probably sleeping somewhere in the house. You slid off your coat and noticed the coffee table. There were 2 cups of hot cocoa. He escorted you to a spot on the couch beside him.
As the bus rides up the mountain, it undergoes a series of sharp dizzying turns called the hairpin turns. A hairpin turn from afar looks something like a horseshoe turn, except that it is narrow because it is a hairpin, right? I remembered the last time I went on those turns, wasn’t prepared and got carsick. But now I know it’s called the hairpin turn. So these turns are something quite special because there are 48 turns round the mountain to the peak, which coincides with the Japanese alphabet which has 48 characters. Try to concentrate and spot every single number of turn and alphabet and i assure that you will get a serious case of carsick xP
Thanks for sending report to me, its states clearly the link between both you and I. Strange to see it in written form,DNA is an amazing thing that links us. Funny to think we are made up of numbers,and speaking of numbers the date in which you showed me 23-08, Man that is something else….I oughta refer to my cheiros book of numbers ha ha.
Yesterday, the 1st of March, Canon announced the new, long-awaited 5DmkIII. I don’t have anything new to say about this that hasn’t been said already. So instead of repeating what everyone else is saying, here is a link to some good blogs about the announcement and specs:
Is it not in our bones that we hold our most intimate self, covered in layers upon layers of social conditioning? Lost behind the reflexive survival instincts which arise in response to environmental influences.
When we find the beauty of planet unseen,
With Sharpton sidelined, Guardian Angels founder Curtis Sliwa, a Canarsie native, was the main marquee name. He had not previously been associated with project proponents and, after a look at the distinctly mixed crowd, declared, “It took a project like Atlantic Yards to bring so many of us together.”
Yea, there are some improbable moments you could get hung up on, if you don’t know how to have a good time. But we do, and thought it was fucking awesome.
Grandma did the morning work: scrubbed the stairs, made the beds, dusted chairs, washed dishes, polished windows, hung the laundry and brought it in. She made over dresses for my mother, turned the collars of Grandpa’s shirts. She repaid her passage, put flowered china on layaway and paid a little every week from her work constructing corsets and pressing sheets. It took another year to earn enough for Bobby, the bisque baby doll she bought since she never had a boy.
Hey ho … So here I am taking advantage of the power to write a blog post extolling the virtues of power cuts. They're like comfort food for a Luddite like me.
The next largest party is New Democracy, PASOK’s centre-right counterpart and main opposition partner. The fact that PASOK and ND are now bedfellows speaks volumes about the magnitude of the situation effecting Greece. That is if the massive riots, unemployment and mass exodus went unnoticed. ND seems to be your run of the mill centre-right party, but it does however have a profound hard right influence. Party leader Antonis Samaras was ejected from the party 16 years ago for his bull-headed stance on Macedonia, and of their two MPs, formerly members of the once third party in the coalition, far right LAOS, have come to the attention of international media for their views and history.
Therefore the God of Deut. 6:4,5 is the Father, the same God , who in Isaiah, says that beside Him there is none else.
Friday 26 March
EARLY CHRISTOPHER 69, JENNIFER, 62, OF UK, 2010-07-16 murdered, Hibberdene Woodgrange smallholdings, KZN bludgeoned and dumped in crashed car.
As time is ticking away,
Did you get any presents???
8. FOLLOW OTHER PEOPLE’S BLOGS — I got really discouraged when I saw peoples’ blogs within the first couple of weeks. I thought I could never do anything that amazing or original, but you know, I actually did. I impressed even myself. And also, buy following someone else, it inspires you to get your lazy butt up and try to keep being productive. It’s a great tool.
Then WHAM again. Nothin’. I feel like I’m Charlie Brown and Lucy is holding my football with the promise, “Really, Charlie Brown, I won’t pull the ball out from under you THIS time …”
Hope you all enjoyed the Super Moon photos.
Passion Score ______
"It was a murder of unimaginable cruelty. It had been a peaceful Sabbath day. My husband, Danny, and I had picnicked with our little girls, Einat, 4, and Yael, 2, on the beach. Around midnight, the terrorists burst into our building. Danny helped our neighbor climb into a crawl space above our bedroom; I went in behind her with Yael in my arms. Danny grabbed Einat and was dashing out the front door when the terrorists came crashing into our flat. They held Danny and Einat . I will never forget the joy and the hatred in the terrorists voices as they swaggered about hunting for us, firing their guns and throwing grenades. As I lay there, I remembered my mother telling me how she had hidden from the Nazis during the Holocaust. "This is just like what happened to my mother, I thought.
Of course the government's first thought is to keep this secret. What would be the point of causing a panic? And how could you persuade people to hand over ten percent of their children if they know what their fate is going to be? This time the aliens say they'll destroy the entire population of earth if their demands are not met - pour encourager les autres, one supposes: to make sure that no other subservient species get too uppity in the future.
Yes, it was very amateurish and I definitely need to place my
Homeopathics have been used for many years. They are very popular in England – the Queen’s doctor is a homeopath. Homeopathics fell out of favor with the rise of allopathy – around the time penicillin was introduced. However, they are making a comeback because they are safe and effective. Another factor that makes homeopathics popular is that they work within minutes.
She doesn't see dead people. She senses when someone near her is about to die. And when that happens, a force beyond her control compels her to scream bloody murder. Literally.
That ridiculous message, that a crucified God is real, and that he chooses to dwell in weak and flawed human beings like all of us here, is still bringing hope all over the world. God’s foolish and weak way of working is capable of reaching the world through us, including this virtual world. The Holy Spirit lives in us and empowers us to spread the word wherever we go, just like those first apostles.
This newly built Georgian Colonial-style estate sits on 14.48 acres near the Round Hill Country Club and has 14,131 sq. ft. of living space. The property features gardens, stables with grooms' quarters, a pool and pool house, a stone gate house, and a one-mile walking path.
I'm here today to talk about a topic that is dear to me, one that I've never fully shared before in such detail: Flea Markets. After going to flea markets over the past 2+ years, I have lots of good tips to share with you that should help you get the most out of your flea market trip and score some good deals. Sound fun?! Okay here we go...
On a happier note, I'm feeling better, both mentally and physically.
For preparation, I first rinsed, dried, and then pounded the chicken breasts to 1/4" thickness, by placing the breasts individually in a large ziplock bag, and then pounding flat with a mallet (you can also use the bottom of a drinking glass). I also set up the three shallow bowls for dredging the chicken. In the first bowl, mix flour, 1/2 tsp salt and 1/4 tsp pepper. In the second bowl, beat egg and water together. Fill the third bowl with bread crumbs.
Like a perfect house or what people think of our homes can truly, deeply satisfy.
Luke 24:5-6
Is a prolific speaker, respected author and TV presenter and as one of the younger CEO’s of a financial services company in London he knows what it takes to lead a successful business. He has the ability to translate, with electrifying effect, hands on experience into a coherent, compelling and exciting philosophy, which has made him one of Europe’s leading key note speakers and a powerful one-to-one coach to some of the world’s leading business executives. He continues to appear on prime time chat shows such as Richard & Judy and makes many radio appearances all around the world. Look out for Nigel’s latest book The IMPACT Code which is setting a new standard for self help guides…..it actually works!
I sent Jason home with my rose, grabbed my warm-up pants and sweatshirt and joined Kim at her intersection to direct traffic for the men's race. Afterward we stuffed our faces with Chipotle (my race bib was good for buy-one-get-one-free burritos). I managed to stay upright long enough to go to the grocery store but afterward I conked out for a two hour nap. Who knew that 25 minutes of all-out activity could wear a person out so much?
R9- Sc in each
The other thing it shows is that I was always destined to be spare with my writing - the limit was 500 words and I coasted in at 325. Such parsimony!
I plan to float mount them on black foam core and surround that with a mat the same color as the paper. The frames are 8 x 8 and black.
The PRC sales assistant was devastated by the remark, writing that his brain was about to ‘explode’:
It took me long to understand that all the people in this world cannot be the same and all cannot exchange my expectations. It is me who should change them to become the ones I expect. I should be open enough to accept their behaviour and understand their nature. I should try to find happiness in the way they are and break the virtual barriers.
We have a tomato thief among us. I have long suspected the backyard squirrels have been the culprits.
Here's the back where you can see the screen print flies a little better.
It’s no longer my birthday. The dishwasher is broken. Everyone has left and I’m alone in the house with the ironing, the washing and the clearing up. We’ve run out of eggs, the oven needs cleaning, the kitchen floor needs hoovering and I still have to get the crumbs and bits of sellotape out of my side of the bed.
The final product:
Come to pick up your cycling bib and take part in the pre-event carnival. There will be music, dance and drama to tune you in to the cycling event of the year and get the city ripe and ready for the India Cyclothon – Hyderabad 2010.
After the Louisiana death figures were released, the mainstream media suppressed the story of the issue of the proportion of whites who met their end in New Orleans, and suppressed reporting on pre-Katrina criminality, while uncritically reporting scurrilous black charges of anti-black genocide.
FUN FACT: they each have a hamper of their own in their rooms... there just must never be room in them.. reason enough to leave them on the floor here!
Shortly after we got back form our vacation, Josh had a business trip. It was just up to Connecticut, not too far, but still time away. I went with him as usual, hoping to use that time in the hotel room to buckle down and get things done. I feel like my list is a mile long. Instead, I found myself grabbing my kindle and looking to do nothing but relax. Get lost in a book. I wanted nothingness. And I felt guilty. Guilty for not only ignoring everything, but because we were leaving the dogs again. My mother in law graciously stayed here yet again to watch them. It was only a few nights, but nevertheless.
If one assumes that the oil peak is far off and that technology will allow us to make a smooth transition to the next energy economy (and solve other related problems that threaten to annihilate us such as global warming), then there is no need to worry about the effects of sudden demand destruction in the oil markets. But, if the peak arrives soon, say, within the next 10 to 15 years, then no bloodless abstraction such as "demand destruction" will be able to obscure the fact that it is people who are going to get destroyed, and lots of them.
I like illusions of a grander room, but
of this foreign place.
What the fuck, society? We have turned cunt into a disgusting term. We have made it dirty. So let’s fucking change that, yeah?
“Jacks, what’s up, eh?” Lily tosses a handful of straws on the table that she must’ve gotten from the bar, unwraps one and puts it into her beer.
The philosophy of evolution which is practiced as a religion and valued enormously by those hardcore evolutionists like Dawkins that consists of the following: corner the market and control the flow of information. Is this really about origins, God vs. evolution?
He did none of the things
I first fell in love with the Rambling Renovators family long before I ever thought of starting my own blog, when I caught a glimpse of the nursery they created for their adorable baby girl, Chloe. Jennifer and her hubby are the King and Queen of DIY renovation and decor in Canada and completely cool, but it seems that all the Canadian bloggers are genuinely good people, ya know?!
“One new mom admitted to feeling bored at home all day, since she was used to being surrounded by activity and other adults at her former job. Another described rushing out to the grocery store as soon as her husband got home, just to have an outing and some time to herself. Do not feel ashamed or guilty if you’ve had the same feelings.” — excerpt from Positive Discipline: The First Three Years, by Jane Nelson, Ed.D., Cheryl Erwin, M.A., and Roslyn Duffy.
Starring: Jamie Bell, Andy Serkis, Daniel Craig
I secretly throw up in my mouth every time I sit at a meeting and listen to some Executive or Creative talk about what other people want and think. In Conference Room A is an ultra conservative, right-wing Ivy League WASP dude talking about how poor inner-city black kids feel and think about fashion; in Conference Room B is the power-hungry closet lesbian pushing 50, talking about which clubs the kids are hitting these days.
7) Unbinding the Feet: Women in Ministry In hindering some women from the fullness of their callings, we hinder the entire Body of Christ as well.
I found myself tearing up a little as we drove away, like I used to when I left my sister's or mom's house knowing I wouldn't see them again for a long time. I knew it was silly, and yet you cannot convince me that our friendship, although more virtual than face-t0-face, is anything but real.
All right, so I'm supposed to tag people for both of these and make up 11 new questions for the last one. I'm gonna kind of cheat and say that anyone who wants to play along can. Consider yourself officially tagged.
Feel good up in the tree, up in the sky, up to the Highest!
“Because,” I say, “then I’ll be able to dole out some cash and have you go get creamer and milk. It’ll be fantastic.”
As we drove along, we talked about the church. She asked if I had met a particular church member yet, and I said, “No.” I asked if she knew another church member, and she said, “No.” In the course of the conversation, we eventually realized we were from two different congregations.
“A Free-Lance Ethereal Grant Distributor? My, that sure is a whole lot of official sounding horse pucky isn't it?” Deflating the charms of wolves and snakes was a gift bestowed by years of shifty men pitching their desires like door to door hucksters. Mattie learned to use her ego bursting lips upon the annoyingly deserving and troublesome creeps long since refined into an art form flicking razor barbs from a vipers tongue. Sassy perfected, Mattie enjoyed the little triumphs in life the most.
I open the door! And you guessed it out bounded an excited Golden Retriever named Molly!
Pierre Bourdieu, the French social anthropologist, has pointed out that no dishonor attaches to such primary transactions as selling short weight, deceiving anyone about quality, quantity or kind of goods, cheating at gambling, and bearing false witness. The doer of these things is merely quicker off the mark than the next fellow; owing him nothing, he is not to be blamed for taking what he can. (2)
Lead me deeper and deeper into the heart of Divine Mercy.
1 cup cocktail peanuts (salted)
I moved to Korea with one adventure in mind. Life ended up dragging me on a wholly different one, which turned out to be the greatest adventure of my life. And at the end of it all, I found my home. We get taken by surprise. We make memories that lodge themselves deep in our hearts for all time. We find love in unexpected places. These are the things that define us. This is life.
Place one row of Oreos from the package in a zip top bag. Break into bite size chunks. Set aside. The remainder of the package will be used later for the topping.
For the viewing of this story of greatly momentous occasion I managed to coerce my wonderful girlfriend, Katie in to joining me. I wonder if she'll regret it?
High quality manufacturing, One year warranty from manufacturer.
Recently I asked someone what was going on and why he was avoiding me, he said nothing, he was just busy with work. That’s what he was doing, was work. I said that I was afraid of losing his companionship and he said that I wouldn’t so we made plans for the next day that depended on whether or not he got his work done.
It’s kind of shell game--as someone said,
The book’s legacy is that these ideas have trickled down into public education, where all the white “elites” of American history get their comeuppance. Thomas Jefferson, for instance, may have written the Declaration of Independence and doubled the size of our nation with the Louisiana Purchase, but we all first think of one of this country’s greatest patriots as a slaveholder. As a student of history, I know this is an historical truth and certainly relevant. But is it fair to focus so much on Jefferson’s hypocrisy? After all, I’m pretty sure the self-evident truth that “all men are created equal” has outlasted slavery in this country.
Even though it was Mother's Day, my mom still volunteered to cook lunch. Usually, we go out to a restaurant on Mother's Day so nobody has to cook, but this time, she wanted to make spaghetti. She made spaghetti with meat sauce for the rest of the family, but she made me a special Vegan Spaghetti with Boca Meat Sauce:
To make matters worse, a dismal 2% of imported seafood is inspected for safety at international borders, posing concerns not only for sustainability, but also human health.
30. The Great Gatsby - F. Scott Fitzgerald
15. Prohibition of discrimination on grounds of religion, race, caste, sex or place of birth
In an interview with Michael Kan for the Independent ("Did a thirst for beer spark civilization?"), McGovern theorizes that alcohol production provided the initial motivation to stop our hunting and gathering ways and to settle down to maintain crops. Which led to civilization.
the tighter my throat gets when I sing "Silent Night".....
I wasn’t sure what to expect, I knew that without the garlic etc, the dish would be pretty bland, but I just wasn’t sure if I’d added enough by way of flavour. This dish was divvied up between 3 of us, me and two men and we got pretty healthy-sized portions.
Ugh, y’all. I think I may be the worst person ever at keeping up a blog. And that’s not internet hyperbole “ever,” that’s really “ever.” Well, you know, maybe not, because I’m here writing now. (From my phone, no less! We live in the future, y’all!)
Love to hear what you think! And for those readers who are A.K. Alexander fans. the next thriller will be out in October. The title of the book is COVERT REICH.
this was a tricky chapter because i had to describe what someone was doing in complete darkness. they didn’t know where they were, so my description/word options were limited because of the lack of a frame of reference.
Haven't gotten it down. Apparently, I am as uncomfortable with bringing the spectre of death into the room as I always feel people must be when I do it.
It is a fight teachers wage every day in every lesson.
Minhao Zeng, University of Alberta, Gold McEwen, University of Alberta, and Christy Gustavison,
Here are the "Good Egg" questions Wendy asks before you get a chick named for you, with my answers.
Heat up wok and put the vegetable oil. Sautéed shallots until fragrant. Add in the chilly paste. Fry for a short while, then add in the water convolvulus. Put sugar and salt to taste.
I just wanted to say a big thank you to you for all you've done in the last year or two for people with ME and CFS.
I mention all of this because, for me, the 1981 compilation module G1-2-3, Against the Giants, encapsulates a lot of the weirdness of my early days in the hobby. I never owned any of the pastel-covered modules on which this one is based, but they were still kicking around hobby and bookstores. Indeed, I did own some pastel-covered modules, since I bought them in 1980 before they were redone. So, my friends and I had a mishmash of stuff published from before we started playing, as well as contemporary stuff published later. There's more to the weirdness than that, though. For the most part, we played RPGs amongst ourselves, but, every so often, a friend's father and older brother would run stuff for us. Even more rarely, the older brother and his friends would run us through a module. Such was the case with Against the Giants.
...hasn't exactly aged well. What can you do? McCartney was a traditionalist; a man needed a maid. In fact, it was this tension that broke up his relationship with Jane Asher. She didn't want to give up her acting career to be a stay-at-home wife. Who did he think she was, Maureen Starkey or Cynthia Lennon?
But you already know that.
So there you go - two of my favorite chapter books to read aloud.
“In this country, prosperity has never trickled down from the wealthy few,” he said. “Prosperity has always come from the bottom up, from a strong and growing middle class.”
The album tells the surreal story of a half Puerto Rican juvenile delinquent named Rael living in New York City, who is swept underground to face bizarre creatures and nightmarish dangers in order to rescue his brother John.
I won't have any more babies myself, and I'm actually sad that I will never experience labour again. I want to try and spread the message that giving birth is not just something to be endured, but something that can be enjoyed, and embraced. It was a chance conversation with a friend, shortly after she had given birth but long before I thought about children myself, that opened my eyes to this concept. I had never heard anyone wax lyrical about the wonder of labour before. I hope I can pass it on.
If you are notpetent to get the very typewrite, occupy into remember these masses tips:
My Experience With Content Mills
I love "Anything Goes" challenges . . . especially when there are sooooo many fabulous new stamps to choose from at 7 Kids College Fund! And let me tell ya, I've been doing a fair amount of shopping at 7 Kids! hehehe!! OK . . . so, without further ado, here's my DT project . . .
So begin by placing the butter in a pan over the lowest heat to melt, then crush the digestive biscuits. The easiest way to do this is to lay them out flat in a polythene bag and crush them with a rolling pin, rolling over using a lot of pressure. Now empty the contents of the bag into a bowl and mix in the Grape-Nuts, then add the melted butter and mix well. Next place the butter-crumb mixture in the flan tin and, using your hands, press it down evenly and firmly all over the base and up the sides of the tin. Then place it on the baking sheet and bake on the centre shelf of the oven for 10-12 minutes, or until crisp and golden brown.
With melting icebergs in it
